I'm passing it along to a few ladies that I consider treasures. I think they have both gotten some other awards, but certainly deserves more!
but not the fourth
The holiest words my tongue can frame,
As I am getting older I find my memory is not as good as it use to be. Not only that, I have also had trouble with my concentration for a while.
I was much struck by a little incident that occurred last year, and helped to prove the truth of this argument. I, amongst others, belonging to a large party who were waiting at a railway station for the train that was to carry us down to a garden party at one of the many lovely places on the Thames, saw an old man, a decrepit creature, bowed and palsied, making his way to where the third-class compartment would be. His arms were full of bundles of various sizes. Coming near a truck, the old man, who was half blind, marched against the edge of it, and all his little bundles fell helplessly to the ground. Most of the young people belonging to our party broke into an irresistible laugh. They were not so much to be blamed. Youth will see amusement in even trifles, but there was one amongst us who did not laugh. The old man's chagrin seemed to touch her. She went quickly forward, and as he groped nervously for his parcels she lifted them one by one, and laid them in his arms. She was not a strictly pretty girl, but there was dignity and sweetness both in her face and in her action. I noticed that a young man, one of our party, watched her intently. He was rich, titled, one of the matches of the London season. Supreme admiration showed itself in his face. He demanded an introduction. I gave it. In six months they were man and wife. She made a good match, and so did he, in every sense of the word.
One thing I will let you in on before we get started...my house is colorful! I love color! At our last church, we lived in the church pastorium, and everything was beige and neutral. I determined that when I had my own house, I was going to fill it with color. And I made good on that!
Not all teens even have this issue. I was never an "everybody else is..." kind of teen. This may be because a series of events that lead me to withdraw from the world and do what the heck I felt like, but the fact remains that peer pressure didn't cause me to smoke or drink or what have you.
We did get down to the the beach to watch a sunset. See....
can you tell i'm already procrastinating?
When we look at successful social justice movements of the past – 19th century abolition of slavery, the suffragists, and the civil rights movement – we see that their leaders were people of strong, serious, and noble character. Frederick Douglass, William Lloyd Garrison, Susan B. Anthony, Elizabeth Cady Stanton, Martin Luther King, and Rosa Parks were not the kind of people who would have engaged in silly or embarrassing publicity stunts to grab the attention of the media of their time. When they received attention from the public, it was because of the moral power of their message and words, not because they “got naked” or engaged in shock humor or other stunts that trivialized the injustices they were fighting against.
Air Force Academy cadets put a great deal of work into preparation for the competition.
It was indeed a sight to behold as the actor felt like a giant amidst the massive babes.
I think he probably made up the story about his encounter with the scammer, too; he wanted to con me in some way, or maybe just pick my brain (he asked me a lot of questions about publishing) and knew he could get to me by pretending to have been scammed. Bad move. Gross went to extraordinary lengths to give his fake contest a gloss of authenticity, and it probably would have held up to casual scrutiny--but it couldn't withstand close investigation, which it might not have received if Gross hadn't written to me. As a result, an Alert about Delmont-Ross was posted on the Writer Beware website in late 2003 (the Alert was removed several years ago, after Gross stopped mentioning the contest in his publicity materials, but you can
The kiddos broke my antique typewriter ((pout :: boo hoo)), so I just typed my words in Photoshop using the Daisy Wheel font and ran the journaling card through my printer.
Director: Gonzalo López-Gallego
This photo doesn't do it justice but hopefully gives you the general idea.
He was that guy
“I want some real nice cereal today. No, I’ll have my weetabix please and 150ml of hazelnut milk which I measure in a glass. I want my control. No, I want fun cereal. No, control. No fun cereal. Ah stuff it, I’ll go for control, we’ll have fun cereal later in the chaos”.
"While we believe that there is no public health risk that justifies any such change, we did ask our caramel suppliers to take this step so that our products would not be subject to the requirement of a scientifically unfounded warning," Ms Garza-Giarlante said in an email.
I have admired Toni's breathtaking watercolor, collage, and calligraphy art for a long time. And although we have yet to meet in person, Toni and I have had the pleasure of conversing back and forth via the web... talking nature, art, and sharing professional advice.
So far expect the following (these are the ones that bit so far):
The opposition has cautiously welcomed Annan’s six-point plan, which calls for Assad’s regime to implement a cease-fire.
*roasted eggplant (I roast about 1/2 and eggplant drizzled with EVOO in the oven until tender and then add it to the blender)
Sound: As night approaches, bird activity lessens, and sounds from bees and insects becomes almost non-existent, creating a sound void.
I seriously promoted the phone to all my family and friends. I even got my best friend to get one. And thanks to Globe’s BB Social plan we’re all connected even if we’re continents apart.
John Butler came onstage and the enthusiasm was high as he played, “Gonna Be A Long Time” for the “Beautiful f**king people” in the audience. The tour had been named “Tin Shed Tales” and the backdrop was some corrugated iron fashioned into a shed-like piece decorated by tea lights, musical instruments, skateboards and art. They were the kinds of things you would imagine in Butler’s shed back home.
On Jonathan’s death (he passed away April 14 at age 87): “There’s something very weird and tragic about the fact that he died just before the film was released. If he had stuck it out – if that fate had been dealt to him – he would have really enjoyed the film and enjoyed the attention.”
Slice chilli into thin rings.
Looking forward to hearing your suggestions:)
The Scottish Conservatives because of the anti SNP feeling have come out rather well, getting their feet under the table in town halls; however the Tories are still a dead party.
OK, so what's the "Out of the ordinary" bit then?
If you live in a common interest community, do not loose sight of the “common”. In the end, those who volunteer are neighbors. They probably bought in the community for some of the same reasons you did. If you disagree with an issue or board position, discuss it openly and in an adult manner. All communities have avenues to bring concerns to the management or boards of directors, use them.
"Prophecy is not some low-hanging fruit that can be plucked from a tree. You have to go to the farmer's market and pay a little extra for it."
Divine Freaks is a great start to the series and with each successive book, Dunbar hones her premise. The second book, Fire and Roses, finds the Slade family travelling round Britain in a caravan, being home-schooled by the delightful Maro – their Greek grandmother. And now Dunbar introduces the element I find most appealing about these books: modern teen meets ghosts with a past. Dunbar is able to pick and choose historical periods and events that will fascinate young readers. She has fun with the Regency period in Fire and Roses, which involves a 18th century feud between members of the Hell Fire club and spooky scenes in the Chilterns cave where the notorious society held meetings. Kitty is clever and determined, and the friendship between Kitty and her younger brother and sister, Sam and Flossie, as they work to solve the mystery, is well drawn and adds real warmth to the books.
So, against this backdrop of Northern dominance of Football, where is the English FA based?
And I was oh so wrong. They played rockin' music. Everything from mo-town classics. To Billy Joel and Elton John. To country. To Snoop Dog's "Gin and Juice." And the only showtune they played was one our group requested - "Summer Lovin'" from Grease. And they made us sing the girls' parts!
Alright, that’s the lengthy and, most likely, unnecessary preamble. Let’s cut the foreplay and whip out…the movie. So, there’s this guy, Bill Cunningham. He’s 83. He did live in a rent-controlled artist studio in Carnegie Hall until he was evicted. He only has about 3 outfits. He has no kitchen, no bathroom because, as he says, “Who needs all those rooms to clean?”. His bed is plywood held up by books. He owns nothing but a camera, a Scwhinn bike and about ten thousand filing cabinets. And he is one of the most respected names in fashion journalism. No fucking joke. This guy, right here, is the definition of artistic badass. If he were a warrior of art, he’d be John McClane strapped to Arnold Schwarzenegger, wrapped in a big ball of Alexander the Great and sprinkled with a dash of Death Star.
League of Strays
And the story was this. Over the weekend, her boyfriend had told her she needed to practice to pray out loud. I mean – we all know she doesn’t. We all know she loves God. So then she was amused and didn’t understand and she probably rolled her eyes at the boy. But he made her practice AND pray about it and then said ‘You never know when you might need it.’
pattern cover graphics need to be generated...
Posh Spice wasn't popular during her pregnancy either. Apparently her heels were too high and she never seemed quite happy enough. There were the endless too posh to push comments too.
-We have a large home with almost 75% of it not being used. We shut off these rooms' vents, and seal under the doors.
The most recent runs on the books were made in 1994. In Edinburgh Linford Christie won the following race:
The Corps of Engineers is about to begin a replenishment project in and around Sea Bright, Mr. Nersesian said. ”It’s quite expensive, probably over $100 million for 12 miles of shoreline,” he said. The money will come from the Federal Government and the state.
1/2 cup mead
11. You Don't Know How Much I Love You (Unknown) 3:44
Artwork to see, sell or buy, from various artists such as:
Bashar Assad’s promise to do all he can to ensure the peace plan came as rebels carried out a string of bold attacks, killing two army colonels and kidnapping a high-ranking pilot.
Last Saturday, I felt the need to do this and whilst feeling a bit guilty about leaving Harry behind and wondering if he would be alright, I made the decision and left home at 9.30 am.
“Once you hear the details of victory, it is hard to distinguish it from a defeat”
Another beautiful tribute from a beautiful aunt :)
"Yes, Sergeant. I'm calling to complain that one of your officers wrote me a ticket for parking an a handicapped space this morning."
Onions ............ 1 big (chopped finely)
Director Steve McQueen (Hunger) gives a powerful and redeemable story of lust and love! The Big Apple where temptation is not a stranger gives emphasis in a harsh reality and it all points out to one man…Brandon! Steve once again collaborates with the lead actor since 2008 for the aforementioned film! He was able to bring out the repercussions of self-loathing which was successfully adhered coming from a finely selected actor that was his only choice to play the role!
So I have returned to blog land. So much to say and yet not much that will interest anyone... Jeff came home for a week and it was the best week I can remember in such a long time. It was so great. But then.. he had to go and now I'm back in insomnia land. I'm about a month behind, yes I said a month behind in school. Why? Oh because of my stupid sleep issues mainly. I am awake all night and then sleep until noon during the day and get nothing done before it is kids pickup time and then there is the whole dinner and evening rush around to actives. Sigh.. I sure hope I can pass and pull this out. While Jeff was here we got dressed up and went to a dining out. It was nice to see him in his mess dress. I happen to think he looks fantastic!
For 4 portions
Images: Clicky!
LED consumes 50% less energy than traditional sources. It is four times more energy efficient than regular incandescent lamps, since a larger part of the energy is converted into light than is lost as heat. There is no use of glass or filament in these kinds of lights as compared to normal lights; hence it has a phenomenally longer lifespan with average life of 50,000 to 80,000 hours. LED light not only reduces the electricity bills but also improves the quality of working conditions at commercial establishments and offices.
After the (demonic) spirit left me I slowly got up and made my way back home, unnerved and changed by the experience. Drugs are a springboard into the lower astral or the second heaven and should be avoided at all costs because we can pick up unwanted entities who will not readily leave us when we later realize who they are. This kind of experience can lead to possession. I was lucky because this did not happen to me.
According to reports from various industry sources, the Chinese government has begun the process of picking a national computer chip instruction set architecture (ISA). This ISA would have to be used for any projects backed with government money — which, in a communist country such as China, is a fairly long list of public and private enterprises and institutions, including China Mobile, the largest wireless carrier in the world. The primary reason for this move is to lessen China’s reliance on western intellectual property.
The F-train uptown was stopped briefly at 14th Street by a TORCH team, as riders patiently waited for the announced "inspection" and then watched as the team spread out on the platform, eyeballing the crowds walking quietly by.
On the right is a model of one of the boats used to ferry Jews to Sweden.
Elouise Cobell Attended Signing Ceremony
On June 28-29 in New York, We'll be discussing all this with some of the leading figures in US responsible business, such as:
It’s horrible.
After that...
Zines and other underground publications are hard to find or unavailable in stores, although you may be able to find zines in some libraries or at independent bookstores (especially in larger cities). The best way to find out about zines is through word of mouth and networking. There are several publications that review zines, giving ordering information for the zine as part of their review. There are also several online communities where zine publishers network and promote their zines. A few of these are listed at the end of this handout.
So it's time again and it's my weekend to watch the baby. Which means that I have to depend on my chump friends to set something up to watch the UH game. Which means I am at HOME with the baby watching the game by myself. I figured that when I can, I may as well combine my football watching and beer blogging. I thought about reviewing a beer from the home city (or state) of each school for my favorite schools. Since I managed to pick up a potbelly and I just bought some expensive slimming french cuff shirts, I'm back on Weightwatchers. Which means unless I hit Memorial Park hard, I can only have a couple beers a day. So I'll just review the beer of the team in the lead at halftime and at the end of the game.
I forget: everything except for when I choose to remember
'cept you and me babe 'cept you and me
3.Workout Music CD Swap - So far I've had an ok turn out for my Workout Music CD Swap but there's still time to join! I'm leaving it open until tomorrow and on Saturday, I'll post the partners! If you're looking for some new workout music, check it out here!
Faber & Faber, 1949, Hardback in dust wrapper.
Weirdcore presents a compilation of Icelandic electronic music:
“Oui, I know, it’s horrible.”
Three blueberries from my garden.
-string
2010.09.01 Pakistan Lahore 43 270 Over thirty Shia pilgrims in a procession are dismantled by a car bomb blast and two Sunni suicide bombers.
For the more active moments, I had set the camera to continuous shooting and then followed Rob’s recommendation to use the high-speed version as well, which did then improve my hit rate of getting some action (note to self: think of better terminology in the future). Although, unfortunately for me as a Sarries fan, I did develop a tendency to capture some less than flattering moments.
There has been a lot of negativity going around Dolphin nation in recent years, understandable so. But I don’t think I’m the only one that looks at this roster and not only sees potential, but I see the probability of major improvements over previous years!
Sincerity, and peace of mind,
She said she supported negotiations with the Taliban, but that Afghanistan’s women should not be sacrificed for that end.
I am Herradura Tequila fan first and foremost with Partida & Fortaleza being a close second.
“hey mom,
8 oz. shredded extra sharp cheddar (2 cups)
1 globe
Some of you may or may not know that I am a member of The Church of Jesus Christ of Latter-Day Saints. Or you might know us by the name Mormon. Yes, I belong to the same faith as Mitt Romney.
More significantly, Luke used the word in the Parable of the Sower in Luke 8:13 to describe the seed which does not take root and “falls away” when persecution comes. Perhaps there is a hint here that John Mark was not quite “rooted” in Paul mission and when he experienced the theologically disturbing idea that Paul was going to turn to the Gentiles, he fell away.
I arrived back in London to a letter, from a friend who’s known me longer than I care to remember. We’ve had very different lives and lifestyles, and I’d been worried about telling her everything I’ve been involved with over the past few years for fear of being judged. But I did tell her. And I wasn’t judged. At all. Instead, she wrote me this…
and guilt in heart
The arrival of the MV Sun Sea is generating information that delegitimizes the excessive presence of Sri Lankan Tamils in Canada. Looks like some repatriations are in order. We have been played for fools and rightly so because we are a nation of trusting fools. Acceptance for Sri Lankan refugee claims should drop dramatically and approach zero if any competency is to be found at the Immigration and Refugee Board. Sadly my confidence in the IRB is lacking so I expect the foolishness so continue.
8.
h (head)
And then, hesitantly and full of trepidation, you take your beloved out of the container of rice (after waiting patiently and not at all after staring at the container the entire time, willing the rice to perform some sort of miraculous, Jesus-worthy, resurrection-type-drying-out job) and press the power button, and...
One of the two men, whom I had seen on several occasions around town, was talking very loudly and aggressively in what can best be described as a 'West Indian' accent…. Although he was white, he had long filthy matted dreads and was almost threatening the Chav type with him, using language that I could best describe as not suitable for ladies of a certain age.
It's the Oklahoma State Sugar Art Show.
but the point is that
Dash's shucking technique was far inferior to Bella's. He didn't protect his hand. He had the wrong angle. But I let him try. The last time he and I ate oysters together, he was not solo-wielding the shucker.
As for the Red Rye Riwaka I found the thai spice, leafy hops and red fruit notes a little more dominant and the body a little less smooth than the sample I had tried previously from the Free Trade Inn, Newcastle (a non wetherspoons pub that took on one of the left over Riwaka casks). Overall I was quite pleased. Sadly I didn't get to try many more and soon enough it will be time to say goodbye to Red Rye Riwaka and hello to the few more projects at Mordue I have up my sleeve. But I won't mention that just yet.
2 seem
There are about 60,000 books.
This page uses a template from Meagan's Creations: Peek a Boo Template pack. Can you find my son? When we moved back in 2009, we would pack a box and then stack them all in the living room to make it easier to move. All the stuff was in our huge living room/dining room area, no searching the rooms for random boxes. Cooper had fun hiding behind the rows of boxes and under the random items in the room.
Though I hope to share lots of my ideas in the coming weeks, I have chosen to start with one of my favorites.
5. Reading texts aloud in class
Marriage has never at any point in our history been about taking a firm stand than now. Christian wife, Christian husband, Christian singles (future marriages), prayer and studying our Bible personally, are vigilant and determined acts. Taking God at His word and in our marriage has the power of the Holy Spirit secured in us. Knowing what God says and wants is a Christians first priority.
Otto Preminger (Anatomy of a Murder, Laura) directs this intense flick. I can’t help but ponder why he shot the whole thing on a sound stage. Budgetary restrictions? The story is so 1950s big city – the heroin addiction, the colorful urban characters, the illegal gambling. Maybe they shot on the sound stage to soften it up (I read that the novel it’s loosely based on is way more harsh). But that issue aside, it’s fantastic directing. The way the characters look at each other, are framed in the shots, even the sound makes everything build beautifully to the seat-gripping final scene. Preminger gets the audience behind Frankie, repulsed by Zosch, and heart-broken by Molly. He’s masterful. I need more Preminger.
Complicating matters are the return of Lord Altar, and two guests, Raffmir and Deefnir, wraithkins of the Seventh Court. Being the Untainted, they have a determined agenda to rid the world of all part human-part fey ‘mongrels’. To alleviate tensions Garvin, the Head Warder, sends Niall on a special assignment acting as a journalist to investigate missing girls in a northern seaside location in England. While there Niall, whose paternal cares threaten to overwhelm him as he struggles to maintain his Warder training against searching for his missing daughter.
Disappointed
There is a pile of clothing and a lunch box of broken wafer biscuits discarded on the quay next to a palm.
You will find such ducats of dream and great
On the other hand, a decision to launch that kind of a shield at this particular moment, when it is Iran’s turn to be scared of a possible attack – be it from the U.S. or from Israel – breaks the above logic. But the logic is restored when we look at the problem from another angle.
So Sime~Gen has ridden a wave of genre-changing, genre-reinvention, genre-generation into the ebook/audiobook world where the printing press has been un-invented or supplanted.
That can change my mind
When your daughter is constantly wearing her brothers' aprons (which they rarely wear), it is time to make one for her. It was probably time a long time ago, but better later than never. I made her this quick two sided apron as a Valentine's Day gift. I just traced one that I had bought for her brother Gage and used that as the pattern.
On result in rattling
We’ve been having showers and thunderstorms off and on over the past several days. While that means that the weeds are winning in all of the flower beds, it has given me time to work on some pictures that have never been properly posted.
So that was last week that we decided to go forward with the Zip Zac chair. Then on Sunday we noticed that Joshua's eyes were starting to get very oozy. We took him to the pediatrician and sure enough- Eye Infection. At the same time we noticed that his little boy area on the right side was looking very swollen. I knew instantly that it was a hernia because he had the exact same thing on his left side a yr ago December. On Wednesday we took him in to see the Urologist and he confirmed that it is in fact another hernia and that he will need another surgery. So surgery #5 is booked for February 23rd. We got through 2011 without any surgeries, but I guess 2012 is another story. Hopefully this will be his one and only this year.
Much ado has been made of the birth certificate number of “Barack Obama”. Why is it out-of-logical-sequence, given that it is higher than that of twin girls born the following day?
The first prenantal appointment is January 27th, which is the 9 week mark. I'm not expecting to be able to hear the heartbeat with a doppler quite yet, but hopefully on the next visit. You never know, we may get lucky. My dr. is going to South Africa for a 6 week visit so while he is gone I am going to be seeing the Obstetrician in town. I am going to try and orchestrate it so that my OB visit lines up perfectly with the visit from the parents so that they will be able to see an ultrasound and get a few pictures to take home with them. This ultrasound will look like much much more of a baby compared to the 6 week little rice picture that we got last time. Don't get me wrong that was a pretty special little rice :)
Because a certain member of our house, the one who cooks all the meals, has gotten all diet happy on us, I have by osmosis, been on his same healthy-eating kick. And I am very excited not only for him, because I know how much this makes him feel better, but also for me. I don’t need to lose weight, no. I am one of those people you might hate, who never gains a pound and weighs the same as they did in high school in the 80s (please don’t do the math). In addition, I’m already mostly vegetarian, seriously hate fast-food, and my only weakness is an occasional bout of chocolate consumption. What’s different though is that things have shifted and there is this lack of muscle tone that is a bit disturbing.
more of his stories.
feels
It doesn’t only save funds purchase also helps you to save a great deal of time as well, since you won’t need to ask yourself around to fetch the details of automobile deal with plans derived from one of workplace to a new. Financial relief a car insurance On-line offer is far more effortless than browsing several automobile deal with providers personally. After obtaining a web-based automobile offer, 100 % free can look for for the greatest deal in an exceedingly laid back disposition and at his or her examine bedroom. An entire practice is very fast when compared to the off-line look for as the buyers basically can look for, select and in some cases get the insurance policy On-line by only simply clicking on a button right away.
On a price-to-rent basis, the Composite 20 index is back to April 2000 levels, and the CoreLogic index is back to February 2000.
People love fizzy drink. It’s hard not to. Admittedly, I don’t anymore, but I used to be hooked. It’s like a game in a cup! Bubbles, weird sort of fizzy noise, and it tastes delicious (generally), what’s not to like?
If you love the three main flavors in samoas you will ADORE these cupcakes. They were simply scrumptious, and looked pretty impressive to if I do say so myself. I used my favorite chocolate cake recipe, and the salted caramel buttercream frosting from Bakers Royale. I topped the cupcakes off with some toasted coconut and drizzled chocolate (wonderful ideas also from Bakers Royale). Much better than the cookies. ;)
From the Vault:
Well, it's been a slice. Thanks for bearing with my little rant. Peace love dove. See, it's working. I'm calmer already.
Astrology + Astronomy or correctly Astronology (this term many may not agree) was practiced for centuries. This field is divided in to 3 major parts. First is mathematical part (Ganitha Ashtakam-Eight Parts of Mathematics) that deals with interplanetary mechanics, rotation cycles of planets, equinox times, rise and setting of planets, satellites like moon, calculation of seasonal cycles etc. This part was highly developed in India since thousands of years and accurately precise as these calculations were done for thousands of years. This interplanetary calculations never dawned in the west until Yohannes Keppler a catholic priest was able to copy these calculations as part of his own with the blessings of catholic church. Till then Church was believing (which still believes) that the earth was center of universe and Sun is rotating around earth-helio centric theory.
The only tangible effect is more outspokenness in their criticism of how the Saudi government was ill-prepared for the Jeddah floods. In just three days from the first Friday after the floods to last Sunday, there were one hundred and ten opinion pieces in Saudi newspapers condemning what happened and criticizing how the government handled things. Also Shiekh Salman Al Ouda broadcast an unprecedented episode of his MBC show where he spoke about how the government must listen to Saudis' demands for more transparency and spoke highly of the movements in Tunis and Egypt. And then Ali Al Olayani, a popular TV presenter, also dedicated a frank and brave show where YouTube videos uploaded by citizens in Jeddah were shown. And the most recent were reports of protesters in Jeddah with some being arrested and there was even a video that was taken down a day later of the protest where you can see men and women marching down a Jeddah street.
Tell me, do you remember it at all now
SM Entertainment has just released the sixteenth teaser for EXO ahead of the boy band’s upcoming debut, introducing members D.O. and Su Ho!
10. Gentle Waves
Check out Friendgiftr.com and start SMART gifting today!
Camair-Co (Cameroon Airlines Corporation) has reported a net loss of $42 million in the first nine months since its launch. The loss was attributed to stiff competition according to Coastweek.
For now, enjoy this glimpse into my “dreaming” brain because today words fail me. Thus I write not by design but about design with a picture included for your viewing pleasure.
Enter Rivaldo, who lest we forget, had already scored two fine goals from 25 yards out. With 89 minutes up, Frank de Boer trotted beyond the halfway line and lofted a hopeful pass towards the Brazilian. Positioned just outside the box, his first touch on the chest padded the ball vertically into the air above him. His second was a whirring back-flip of limbs, measured immaculately and with perfect techique. A split-second later, the ball had zipped into Santiago Canizares’ bottom-left corner. The Camp Nou erupted and the zeal of President Joan Gaspart’s celebrations high in the stands indicated all one needed to know about the importance of Rivaldo’s strike.
You see, this is how I always talk myself out of spending any money on myself. I keep at it until I've talked myself right out of everything! (Maybe that's why I now have no clothes that I actually feel good in. But THAT'S a whole 'nother post!)
It’s hard to see how this would be at all possible. Emma has no real evidence to blackmail Regina with, and, as far as Regina is concerned, no way of actually contesting the adoption in court. Also, was it just me, or did this sudden revolt come out of nowhere?
"Master?" Sulien was at my side. "If we are to reach Celliwic tonight, we must leave soon."
Hans de Booy Alle vrouwen NL
A forty barrel underback? Seems a bit small for a 60 quarter copper. How many chains to the hogshead is that?
The major selling point of this device is of course, retro gaming. It is a joy to run emulators so you can play NES, SNES, Genesis, N64, GBA and Playstation 1 games on it flawlessly.
Because I play old school, the 90′s part didn’t surprise me. The dirty part definitely did. Truth be known, I do play some of the raunchiest music in town: “My Dick” by Mickey Avalon, “The Whisper Song” by The Ying Yang Twins and Missy Elliot’s “Work It”. I just never saw it as a genre. I play nasty music because women dance to it.
#4 (bonus)
As we mentioned on the previous page, one criminal drawback is the lack of internal storage. For this, Sony really needs to take a long, hard look at itself because it’s really not a very clever move. Talk about a put-off.
The women performed sex acts for money in hotels, apartments and the backseats of cars; charging between $200 and $500 per customer. Livery cab drivers also arranged for and profited from the prostitution services between their passengers and the trafficking victims.
"No, really, she fell on her 'I wuv you' and she broke the girls head off. She's planning to get it fixed though, once she's up and about again."
Biting into the cheese, I'm struck by how much funkier and onion-like it is, in addition to being quite creamy. My palate is immediately coated in a thick layer of fat as the softness of the cheese provides a lot of cover. Sipping on the Hoppe, the carbonation cuts through most of the viscous cheese and the sharpness of the piney hops parries the tangy taste. A sweet, caramel-like malt flavor brings up the rear, but seems more out of place than I had anticipated and doesn't seem to fulfill the role I had envisioned.
You know what? I hate the term ‘mental illness’. I hate saying ‘living with mental illness’. More than hating the terms, I hate that society tells us that saying that is somehow wrong.
Sixty Seconds is a coveted invitation to a private party with 45 of the most extraordinary individuals, who share highly personal and poignant stories of how unpredictable moments impacted their lives, forever changing them. Each storyteller’s authentic voice animates an atmosphere of intimacy. I felt as though I were sharing privileged conversations with wise and trusted confidants. In addition to these magnificent, entertaining, and revealing stories, Sixty Seconds also features an elegant foreword by Caroline Myss, and wonderfully insightful commentary by Phil Bolsta that introduces each group of stories throughout the book. Simply put, Sixty Seconds delivers a master class in wisdom that belies the simplicity of its humble title.
BB&Q Band ~ On The Beat ~ Capitol ~ 1981
Warming you to comfort
With each car, Michele's story changes: in one, his wooden arm is a war wound, in another, an injury received as he saved children from a burning home. Even if he's a warm and gregarious presence, he's also evasive and, thus, mysterious. The only thing we know for sure is that he has a 14-year-old son, Cazzillo (a very cute Giovanni Piscopo), with a congenital heart defect - we know this for sure because we actually meet Cazzillo, as rascally as his father, when Michele finds him shaving in the train's bathroom. (Okay, that whole scene was adorable.)
The City of Detroit and its surrounding area has been plagued with a self-perpetuating set of continuously worsening problems for decades now. Detroit lost jobs and investment with the decline of its signature auto industry and coupled with poor management and decision-making, led to a reduced population and tax base, stagnation, higher crime, less comprehensive services, lower standards of living, economic despair, higher levels of blight, and a feeling of hopelessness. Focusing on just one of these areas appears to be a futile effort because the impact of the other problems cannot be forgotten. Despite the challenge, each one of these areas does need to be addressed as part of a comprehensive strategy. An investment in vital infrastructure that creates the opportunity for easier movement in and out of the area, higher levels of economic activity and a more prestigious experience is a key to slowly easing into a more favorable situation to start solving other long-term problems.
myself to say otherwise,” she
“Adjudicators should do what they are trained to do — review voluminous files to determine eligibility for disability benefits. Office of Inspector General fraud investigators should do what they are trained to do — vigorously follow up on any evidence of fraud,” said Kia S. Green, a spokeswoman for the agency.
I even have to leave the house to get internet access and....
Nigeria (TRANSCORP)
Cook pasta as package directs. Drain and add to bowl with tomatoes; lightly toss. Let come to room temperature. Add basil; toss. Serve or refrigerate up to 1 day.
Post Traumatic Stress Disorder (PTSD) – This is an unbearable condition that occurs in people who have experienced or witnessed a natural disaster, serious accident, terrorist incident, sudden death of a loved one, war, violent personal assault, or any other life threatening event. Most times people who experience these things will recover from them, but people with PTSD will be depressed and anxious for months or years to follow.
Any type of craft is welcome.
There is a new point of view character in Coldest War. That novel follows a similar structure to Bitter Seeds. Necessary Evil, which I'm finishing now, differs from the previous two novels both in style and viewpoint characters. The stylistic change in this third novel has made for an interesting challenge, but I'm excited about it. The Coldest War is currently scheduled for February, 2011. I don't know when Necessary Evil will be hitting shelves.
Do you want my samples?
Best Sound Editing
anyway, in the grand scheme of things, w.s.b was a wild man with words...his imagery is still surfacing in my dreams at times...
It was after our gig this morning, as my chorus members were munching on bad falafel, that one of them told me something that made me laugh, and laugh, and laugh, and laugh. I’m not sure I’ve discovered comic gold this fantastic since 9/11.
Danto wrote in:The Artworld: "To see something as art requires something the eye cannot descry-an atmosphere of artistic theory, a knowledge of the history of art: an art world." That has nothing to do with the work itself but where it is. Art is practice not theory.
Luke Perry?
Anne Bagby
I had this shift two years ago where I stopped thinking about my life in terms of success and started thinking of my life in terms of contribution.
Hi Hello How are you! Well if you are seeing this then you must have bookmarked the page in between the time when “A Pennie For Your Thoughts” was taken down, and replaced with “Pennie’s Thoughts”. In doing that, I apparently violated some Terms of Service with the original blog hosting page. My work, projects that I have been working on for over a year now were all lost. All my articles, everyone’s beautiful comments, all my graphics, banners, and web rings are all gone. Gone as if I had taken the blog down myself, and retired! To make matters worse, my computer had crashed a couple of months prior to this, and so almost ALL of my pictures are lost too.
So, that's my latest break experience. Worked out OK.
Mix the ingredients together until there you have a slightly sticking dough formed, flour a clean work surface and knead the dough until it is smooth and slightly elastic – about 5 minutes or so.
Beer Karma strikes again. Ricky Stuart; shit bloke, no trophy.
stuff--that word game (words w/ friends) and pinterest. holy mother of god those things entertain the shit out of me. when i am beyond mind numbed at work--i like shit on pinterest. i have a johnny board. that man is in my face every damn day--he is fucking gorgeous.
Her youngest sister calling to say she’s coming by
Did I know how to be a Young Women's President? No. H No.
I am writing this blog with the thought that it may never see the "publish" button or maybe it will! I am torn on this issue but feel the need to empty out my brain before it explodes...and here is why!
Instead of affirming their righteous and just cause, the government sent thugs in police uniforms to beat up innocent people, fire tear gas and water cannons at them, in the worst case of police brutality the nation has ever seen.
Gunnlaug told the king what had befallen; and he said, “Now, indeed, have things taken a right hopeless turn; for this man’s eyes can dull any weapon. But thou shalt follow my rede; here is a sword I will give thee—with that thou shalt fight, but before the battle show him another.”
36-banters and announcements 2.38
This month's Little Red Scrapbook kit is Basic Greys PB&J line. The bold patterns and colors are standard BG yumminess! Here is a card I made with the kit. Check back on the 15th for the full design team reveal.
04. Restless - 6:11
I love the visual picture that comes to mind when reading this. A tree planted by a river will ALWAYS be green and luscious as it does not have to ‘look’ for the source of life. It is rooted there already. The tree can drink up what it needs to stay vibrant and to thrive. It will always bear fruit at the right time.
It was pointed out that the nurses and midwives around the world celebrate the International Day of the Midwife on May 5 and International Nurses Day on May 12 each year on Florence Nightingale’s birthday to raise awareness about their respective roles in global health care.
Leval also took issue with the evangelical church’s membership. “Bronx Household acknowledges that it excludes persons not baptized, as well as persons who have been excommunicated or who advocate the Islamic religion, from full participation in its services,” he wrote.
We are an on-site durable medical equipment provider:
You have two options here. You can stay huddled with the masses,
McCloy EC. The health of women at work. JR Soc Med 1990; 83: 759-760.
I love work and don’t like letting people down, yet it was so nice to drop EJ off at the nursery and not the kids club for a change!
The Omphoy Ocean Resort in Palm Beach, FL, has surfing classes.
Capital of Syria.
and owl that drops from a branch
Usually it's the last 28 days and you can export it all the time, like you back up your database.
is called "Tiffany Dreams" and stars Tiffany ...
Crazy chancers
Who once had known the sky,
I don't mean eff as in that wonderfully flexible expletive I would have liked to utter (as noun, adjective, verb, or other part of speech -- thank you, George Carlin) when, at the end of yesterday, my manuscript was not in my hands. Yes, I've e-mailed my professor to get the tracking number.
Genre: Jazz / Vocal Jazz
Did I mention it's a BIG hill?
The old man blew his nose into his hankie once more. Then, hanging onto a chair, he pulled himself up from the floor. Buttoning his overcoat, he reached for the dog's leash and softly said, "Come here my friend." He opened the door against a gust of cold air and stepped outside, pulling the dog behind. Dusk was beginning to fall. Monsieur DuPree pulled back. He didn't want to go.
Alan Neville, Area Manager for National Express East Anglia, said carriages had been added to trains to help transport the protestors.
Finally, I would like to thank everyone who reads this blog and hope all of you come back for more in year two of this endeavor. I cannot express enough how much I am encouraged by those willing to spend the time reading my words.
He said: ‘They don’t have a right to disrupt other people and keep other people from protesting or just going about their business, and we will do as we normally do – find the right balance.’
your long awaited ship in its swell.
Outlets! Side splash! Beadboard! Medicine Cabinet! Hair accessories!!
"I don't care if he has been in a relationship for 3 years with a woman. The back of his jeans were bedazzled. That doesn't scream manly, that screams I listen to show tunes!"
Snow was hard to categorize musically; a Times reviewer early in her career called her style “a helter skelter amalgam of pop, jazz, blues, gospel and folk.” She explained to the New York Times in 2003, “No creative person should ever produce the same thing over and over.”
And you're going to kill me, Nicki, for breaking my promise to allow you to remain anonymous. But that's okay, you live too far away to do anything ;)
Thirteen fell …
Live to Tell
Audio samples can be found HERE and then click on blue arrow next to running time for samples of entire album or individual tracks.
I should do this more often.
This weeks edition is dedicated to Harvard Law School and one of its most famous alumnus President Obama.
Thinkin’ you’re the one that I’ve been waiting for
there isn’t even any left of anything.
activists and organizers don't take care of themselves very well. They get burned out and either don't know, don't care, or don't know how to fix it. Burnout isn't just a cliché. For its victims, it means real suffering. It undermines their energy, passion and imagination, and it spreads like a virus through their workplaces and families. Almost every aspect of their lives takes a hit--health, relationships with friends
Come by this evening for the opening of "15 Points", an exhibition by Lisa Tichy. This installation is a fresh and haunting new work which utilizes her extensive collection of boro and folk garments from Japan.
1 tbsp peanut oil
I made a promise to watch it with the aforesaid awesome person.
To higher ground.
“Re-Re? Sure,” he replied.
I love Keep America Beautiful Inc. They have a variety of programs like The Great American Cleanup, America Recycles Day, the Recycle Bowl and Clean Sweep USA that not only make our communities cleaner and more beautiful, but also create a ripple effect of awareness, appreciation and concern for our environment.
Although I thoroughly enjoyed The Bleeding House, it’s difficult to recommend the DVD at it’s current price tag ($26.95 on Amazon) because of the few special features. The commentary track is quite solid, but the other features are lacking any significance. The film itself is worth checking out, but I wouldn’t pick this DVD up for anything more than $10 – $15.
I’ve been talking up the Bankers without Borders program to MFIs across Accra, and this is finally my chance to watch it in action. Grameen Foundation asked me to shadow a BwB project for a partner MFI called Grameen Ghana in the northern city of Tamale (surprisingly no affiliation despite the shared namesake). A volunteer from an investment bank in NYC, Noah, is delivering training on a new financial model over a 4-day assignment. This is only the second time this Grameen Foundation model has been passed on to another MFI, but BwB hopes this will eventually lead to a standard for financial projections across the industry.
Khai has chaired many jury panels including serving as a Cannes Lions juror on the Press and Outdoor Lions in 2003, the Press Lions in 2007, the Titanium & Integrated Lions in 2010, and as President of the Film, Print, Outdoor, Radio and Integrated juries for the Dubai International Advertising Festival in 2009. He has won countless awards and grands prix over the years from every major show including Cannes Lions, D&AD, The One Show, the Clio Awards and London International Awards.
that opened onto a dining area with a stage.
Must have 24 months experience on similar type of AHTS – 1550 GRT / 5150 BHP, clearly showing in seaman’s book.
Take 4" x 4" black cardstock (score at 2" then fold in half and staple to bag) . Then punch our 2" x 4" green cardsock with a fun Halloween boarder punch. Layer on the 1" x 4" Patten Paper and attach some black ribbon. Tie a knot then add a stamped sentiment and your done!!
By the early 1700s White Bines predominated and the best were grown in Farnham: Farnham White Bines. Hops were named by their shape, their grower or the place they were grown in. So when Farnham White Bines spread to the Midlands and over to East Kent they became known by different names, such as Canterbury White Bines.
2. The standard keyboard for the first time is actually pretty decent, even though its not as intelligent as SwiftKey X.
But I am happy. I still get dressed up for nights out, and I make myself and other people laugh. I plan my weekends, and take enjoyment from all the little things that cannot be taken from me by dialysis.
As I've written before, most military families quickly learn that post-deployment can be more difficult and stressful than is deployment itself. What happens when physical distance is erased but emotional distance remains? That's a question I often ask audiences when I'm reading from Stateside. Everyone--both civilians and those connected to the military--are inclined to make a romance of reunion. We imagine the soldier dressed in camis. He kneels in a public space, opening his arms to welcome his wife, his children, his golden retriever, as they all rush toward him in a blur of weeping. Sometimes when I click on the homepage of USAA, I see these very moments at the top of the browser in clean, bright shades of patriotism.
CorningWare $2/1
I don’t really have a favorite Bach piece. I don’t go through all of Bach’s music to try and pick out one single piece that is really my favorite mostly because I generally don’t listen to Bach. When I listen to music, it is classic rock like Journey, Foreigner, and Steve Miller Band, or (blasphemy) pop, hip-hop, and rap.
Sorry about the math. Are you still with me? Please stay. Stay to help me. I really need help. Duh.
I have always been a crafter. I am married to my wonderful husband Kip who over the years has been a wood workman extraordinaire. When our three kids were little I started crafting dolls to sell at shops and shows so I could be a stay at home mom.
Razorwing Jetfighter
"What are they gonna do? Arrest me?" I reply:
We never even kissed.
I also purchased some wonderful partner reading texts this year, all from the "You Read to Me, I Read to You" series, and they have been a hit!
So I suppose it's not too surprising when you see more state-funded fantasy being put forward to defend plain packaging of tobacco. Incredibly, they've produced another load of 'myths' which - if the last lot are to be taken as a guide - will be proven to be true as soon as our daft politicians have been stupid enough to pass the law.
I have a quick question. Do you guys go looking for challenges to include in your card, or do you create something and then go find challenges that fit with what you've created? Or maybe both? I usually go hunting for challenges before I create my project, to try to step outside my normal box. I was just curious.
Here is another 6 petalled flower I made using paper from the paper pack Magnifique
Somehow this song came flooding to my mind.
Where does your newly resurrected vision lead you? What goals do you want to achieve along the way to realizing it? Be specific. Be concrete. (You don’t have to do a whole strategic plan here – just get the motor running again.)
blueprint
What is Sam Adams?
having kept vara siddhi vinAyaka dEvata in mind,
...I won, for the record.
Snow can wait
The most genuine people are the ones who do their good deeds by stealth. Don’t put too much faith in the guy who does you a favor, but reminds you of it in front of others.
Confession: I have actually looked into buying a copy of Five Centuries of Verse, the book the Dead Poets read from in the cave. It does in fact exist, though some of the poems they read don’t actually appear in it.
1 intelligible
“I was shocked. I had no idea this would happen. Since when does a bank not accept cash?” Robert wrote after the affair.
“There” he said satisfied. “There will be fine, don’t move.”
80% of the water pumped underground generally remains underground. The rest must be disposed of. While perhaps up to 8% may get pumped underground again in this fashion leaving 12% in the form of the most polluted produced water to be otherwise disposed of.
Till next time: Love and Peace
Initially, when we first registered, we had no clue what we wanted in a stroller and a car seat. I just knew that I wanted to be able to snap the car seat into the stroller, for easy travel. So, we ended up gravitating to the “travel systems”. I had heard of Chicco and Graco, but that was about it. Did I think to check out reviews and safety information online before registering? Of course not. So, we registered at random for the Chicco Cortina Travel System – Azura. It looked nice, and we liked the color. But, did we try to fold it up? No. Did we see how heavy it was? No. Did we even wheel it around the store? No. We were officially baby-stuff-buying rookies. So needless to say, I started to have buyer’s…err…register’s remorse.
something yet knowing
¼ tsp. ground black pepper
Stir in onion and next 3 ingredients; cook 7 minutes or until vegetables are tender, stirring often. Gradually stir in warm broth; bring mixture to a boil. Stir in bay leaves and next 4 ingredients; reduce heat, and simmer, uncovered, 50 minutes, stirring occasionally.
And, when we came along the main street, the lights of all the windows of the Churches and the Synagogue were lighted up and we went into Church: The Crowds filled the whole Church! Out the front door, down the street… great crowds!
I wouldn't want to be associated with any company who still supported Betamax, VHS, 8 tracks, cassette tapes, vinyl records, 35mm film, analog televisions, CRT monitors, dot matrix printers, etc.
Sunderland are much improved of late, but it’s Swansea who are the top half team going into this match. The Welsh side finally got themselves a long overdue away win at Aston Villa recently.
The proposed amendment to the EEA is therefore not ambiguous. In fact, the amendment is a clear reflection of the effect of Manyi's ideological framework of representation and is not an inadvertent mistake.
Families like Matt and Jill, who still make up many of the homeschooling families I see professionally, occasionally express annoyance at required record keeping; they’re motivated to do it right even without oversight.
The only advice I have is to point back to what Richard Phillips said: If you want to know God’s plan for your life, start looking for needs in your church that you can fill. Build relationships with those who can help you identify gifts — and sin — you didn’t know you had. Get involved in the Lord’s work, and be prepared to follow where He leads. Understand that he may lead you just one step at a time, but understand as well that you can trust that He also knows the steps that come next.
“Other ladies?” Jessica said weakly.
DO NOT EXPECT HELP FROM ANYONE THAT HATED YOU ALL ALONG.
Now it is up to us to gain some recognition
During the rest of August, the sculpture will be brought to glorious life under Dougherty’s direction, aided by a corps of assistants from the Garden’s staff and volunteers. Some helpers will be scaling scaffolding to manage the vertical support poles; others will be instructed in the artist’s signature weaving process, which lends Dougherty’s sculpture its structural strength and visual dynamism.
Having ‘bravely run away’ from the hail and snow last week (as my friend Heather pointed out!), we have now slunk back home to find that April in Scotland is, once again, fresh and beautiful and as astonishingly green as I have ever seen. It looks more like May here: our ancient gean, our Queen of the May, came into blossom on the last day of March, while the sycamores are in full leaf and even the oaks, almost the last to catch up with spring, are soft-outlined with fresh growth. The daffodils are a cheerful shout of yellow, the bluebells – astonishingly – are beginning to flower, the oyster-catchers are nesting and the pied wagtails and curlews are here again. So it is a great pleasure to be home (despite the odd snow shower). But my goodness, what a pleasure it was to have a holiday too!
Anyway, back to the training. I was one of two trainees, the other a cool Kenyan dude. There was a driver and the tour guide, and 6 guests (plus an awesome Welsh couple for one week of it). While I won’t go into the specifics, the two weeks was spent driving from Nairobi to Kampala over 3 days(with a game drive in Nakuru, which the other trainee went on while I went shopping), Kampala to Queen Elizabeth National Park, where I did see elephants and hippos, Q. Liz to Lake Bunyonyi, where I did very little around the allegedly second deepest lake in Africa (or first, or third), while the clients went gorilla tracking, Lake B to Jinja, where I did little, went on a booze cruise (free for crew) and went white water rafting again (also free), then Jinja to Nairobi.
slightly to keep the soil in place. These are meant to hang on an outside wall, fence, or any vertical surface you want to decorate. You can butt them up against each other and hang as many as you like together. I'd love a good portion of a fence covered with them, but just don't have the sunny area.
You know what I like even more? I like it when that instigator has also thought through things enough to follow up his cage rattling with some real and positive steps towards a better future. It is not enough to simply say things are wrong. A compelling vision of what could be must be presented. My gratitude to Scot McKnight for doing just that. His final two chapters of The King Jesus Gospel (find a summary of chapter 9 here) provide some tangible steps forward after eight chapters identifying where we’ve gone wrong with the gospel.
From Behind Curtain 2, we are excited to announce that Skye Robertson has commenced her challenge. From her Margaret River studio Skye will create an artwork a day for 30 days. Skye describes her challenge:
Though not impossible to find, the restaurant's location is not immediately obvious. It helps if you've spent time as a boy scout. At any rate, it's worth seeking out if you love good tempura.
#43. awards at the gym
“This means that candidates and their staff are not allowed to verify the identities of voters or even to check if they are at the correct polling stations,” said Bersih co-chairperson S Ambiga.
What is interesting in architecture is that this idea of play can on the contrary be politically very provocative.
the art work is this stamp made by me..
“Hey D yeah sure hang on.”
If truth be told in a past life, perhaps I indulged myself a bit too far in the ‘between meal fandango’ as I now like to refer to it.
The new product will be called Casamigos. Gerber said he and Clooney plan on "making the liquor available to all." I'm not sure what that means, unless it's a broad hint that it won't be priced at the premium level.
Because we are going to work on every aspect of your soul. Every life ever lived, every ‘you’ that has ever been, in every possible dimension. Which is rather extensive, when you think about it.
Some of the men who had sex with her include 9 civil servants, a senior banker, a company director, a senior vice-president of a private company, lawyers, a senior police officer, as well as the former principal of Pei Chun Public School Lee Lip Hong. Their ages range from between 21 to 48 years old.
You see these guns, man, this is how real people fight? (Yeah!)
Chris: Well cool for you! But Christy’s getting weird. She keeps telling me to play with myself, but she’s giving me directions for equipment that I just don’t have…
“That’s also the same description those kids at the steel mills gave when they saw a similar vehicle leaving the scene. Seems like the syndicate is starting to make waves once again,” said Clyde.
Tonight, Rashida Jones was tracing her mother’s ancestry. It was an interesting journey and had elements I can identify with. I am of Eastern European Jewish descent. I can identify with some of the stories. I learned about her grandmother, who came from Ireland and I learned what a Taxi Dancer was. (Rashida’s mothers family went from Latvia, then part of Russia to Manchester, England, then to Dublin. You don’t think of Ireland as a Jewish community, though Dublin did have a Jewish mayor once).
Cost: 2
If you are a blogger and are having similar issues, let me know what to do. I don't want to take the blog to only private readers, but I may have to do something different. I have "blocked search engines", but since the site in question already has the link, I don't know what to do.
72:2012
Today we went to Nora’s first pediatrician appointment. Ordinarily I am not crazy about the medical visits. I’m much more at ease being in the comfort of our home where we can focus on living in the present moment instead of worrying about what the future holds. Of course I want to do anything and everything I can to ensure Nora’s well-being, but while everything is going well at home, I’d just assume stay there basking in the sweetness.
What's your favourite 'work-wear'?
So if I may offer, over a quarter century of homespun, financial savvy on what it truly means to live a cycling lifestyle, dollar-wise:
I’ll start where the album starts: “Where the Streets Have No Name.” This is the ultimate U2 song. Maybe it’s not their “best” pure song, but it might be my favorite and their most representative track. If someone had no clue, if they came from the future or the past or from another planet, you could just play that song and say THIS is what U2 is. Play it loud. The way the intro fades in and soon engulfs you in The Edge’s spider web of arpeggio notes drizzling down on you from the delay pedal. And then the bass changes notes and pretty soon the drums come running and racing in and you are charging toward something.
The thing I really found surprising was that on the two occasions when "the act" was mentioned, it was taken for granted that they couldn't possibly know anything about this business and if they did they would be horrified.
Chessa (Team Cee Lo) – She was in the bottom 3 and won Cee Lo’s save. Cee Lo obviously has a special place in his heart for Chessa. She has such a great personality and she is really likeable on tv. Tonight she sings “I Have Nothing” by Whitney Houston. Tonight I really enjoyed her performance. And she looked really beautiful. She has that power and she was hitting all the notes in the right places. She got a standing ovation from Xtina. Amazing. Xtina said she applauds her for courage singing such a beloved song, and she hit notes that Whitney didn’t hit, and Xtina said this week Team Cee Lo is where its at. He said she did a wonderful job and he gave Chessa some big shoes to feel. He said he is ready for today’s artists to sing grown women songs and not like today’s auto tuned teeny boppers. 1-855-VOICE-06
I will be watching his progress closely. I think his potential is unlimited. He is running the Shamrock Shuffle this Sunday in Chicago. It will be interesting to see how he mixes it up with some of the big boys in the 8k. He ran 25:31 to finish 11Th overall last year as an 8Th grader. Pretty impressive stuff. I hope after his May Triathlon he "dabbles" in Track at the Nike Outdoor Nationals.
Below is a visual blessing I made a couple of weeks ago but haven't given yet. I know who it is for, but haven't had the opportunity to give it yet. I don't like to post blessings until I have given them, but this one seems especially timely to me in light of the circumstances of people around me and the inner battles I've been facing recently. I take hope in the image of the resurrected Christ, life after death, and resurrection power for living. I am also taking to heart the quote by Priscilla Maurice. I hope it encourages you too. Today I read John 15, and am comforted that God doesn't expect me to do anything without him. I know I can't, but He can.
This challenge is supposed to be about having fun and sharing your awesome creations!!! As of right now, this challenge is just for fun...so there will not be any prizes of monetary value, however, I will issue the winner a certificate and issue mom a badge for her blog. I will be creating a group to help me pick the winners.
My mom's response was that she was, "Trying to feed these cattle! And I noticed these bales were lighter, so I loaded them onto the tractor, because they were easier for me to lift, but now they won't eat it." (I can totally hear my mom saying this, too, because she probably sounded a lot like me when I am about to have a nervous breakdown about something.)
I would love to post the pics I have that I have been meaning to post but since I am at my in-laws and they just got their Internet back I am just happy to be able to post anything! When I get back to normal life I will have some cute pics of the boys to share.
04 - Artwork Forbade 4:04
Holi is the celebration of the start of spring. It’s a mad colorful, huge expression of happiness, frivolity and exuberance. To express the feeling Indians start the day by covering friends, family and strangers with color. The color is powder and stays put because of the water that is thrown first. My niece started four days prior in Delhi by throwing balloons from the balcony on the traffic below. Everyone is in a good mood and doesn’t mind being hit with a water balloon. Amazingly enough, throwing water and water balloons at strangers is encouraged and provides lots of amusement. On the actual day of Holi, we went to the Chandigarh Rock Garden—and celebrated with water, color and made new fiends.
~ Simply be a follower of this blog or become one! Then leave a comment to this post to add your name to the drawing. BE SURE TO ADD YOUR EMAIL ADDRESS SO I CAN CONTACT THE WINNER!
6. (Optional) While the cupcakes are still warm, brush the tops with tequila or tequila/orange mixture.
No fools, only opens admission to civilian’s fulminations, then quickly, seamlessly closes.
“What are your symptoms?!” I demanded. I typed in red rash, with results for Heart Disease. The following information appeared In a panic she began to cry, thinking her death was near and I knew the joke had gone too far. I reassured her that she was fine because she didn’t live in the United States. A perfect example of the power the internet has on people and how it effects those who believe it is full of only the truth.
My cousin thinks he was shot to death for over-celebrating every tackle like he just won the super bowl. I don’t know how he lives with himself.
Brace yourself, people. You are entering the world of Jackwagons gone wild. Say What? is a series of quotes that I collect as I go about my daily business of deciphering the “news”. I take no responsibility for any keyboards or monitors you may ruin in the course of reading this column. There is also bound to be NSFW language along the way, consider yourself warned. Be sure to look for link Easter Eggs as you go. Please keep your head and arms inside the ride at all times. Enjoy!
from his friend, the king fired it and his thumb was blown off.
Joe Stewart
More numerous of Windows –
I'm off to take some antibiotics now. Can you mix those with the other type of WINE?
Some people don't eat pork and some don't eat beef for their religious belief.
before they’re forever banned?
Little words, birds of meaning flying above anathema foes,
"this song is a very unique style of pop music very good"
I did like the history and descriptions in the book. The author does a splendid job of describing the house, the grounds, and the villages throughout the story. She describes flowers and scents like no one I’ve ever read before – making one almost anticipate the aroma that should jump from the pages but never does. I would fill my house with flowers if it would be anything like what she details throughout the story.
"The inspector said we were white dogs and he told a white policewoman that he would see to it that she was shot dead in a robbery. "Then he cocked his R5 (rifle) in my face and said it was time that we whites packed our bags and f-cked off out of the country."
Label: Judgmental Christian chick
Dare: I started daring myself to continue to go out dancing. Illness is never fun and I thought to myself, “If I’m still able to dance 3-5 days a week I’m not sick.” Well like all dares there’s only so far that you can push it until you reach a point of no return.
Long time no post! I have spent the last 2 weeks sick with a horrible cough AND sinus infection! I am starting to feel better, but now the holidays are sneaking up seriously FAST! I lost a lot of time being sick!!!
The Amazon Kindle, launched in 2007, is a digital book reader. This device allows you to search and download book, and show pages on its 6 Inch monitor. This device is a portable gadget and as light as a paperback of a book.
Sleep in 8 different beds
And then that fatefull day of searching: I had read The Gift of Dyslexia, by Ron Davis. and Thom Hartmann's ADD board lead me to believe that there were people out there who knew, who I could interact with, who had survived and thrived regardless of their labels.
Deep in the heart of the plastic potted jungle Johnny, your Christmas number one hitmaker, gets out his director's chair, hums along with the music for what seems like minutes to start and eventually tells of how everyone will feel great upon the Second Coming. With meaning, too. The new number one is back luck for the girl at the end who's holding a Showaddywaddy album, who when we first see the final link is dancing with Noel to an undanceable song ("thank you for the dance" "That's OK!" No, of course she never seemed comfortable). The woman to Noel's other side holding a cracker is less lucky, but both of them fall victim to a hasty director when they start singing happy birthday to Noel, who would have been 28 (yes, really) the day before, and hence the day of recording. We don't even hear them get to the end of the first line. Instead it's Jethro Tull audio and a kaleidoscope pan shot of the lights, the old style credits sequence we've not seen for a while. Meanwhile John Christie is back in the dressing room imagining all the glory and wonders sure now to come his way in 1977.
For more on this subject, check out a great post by Rachel over at “Youth Leaders Academy” which can be read here.
What's going to happen when it gets hot out? Keep your Go-bag packed and check your escape routes my friends. Never hurts to be ready for trouble.
Some businesses are moving into different geographic markets, helping diversify our U.S.-centric export focus. They’re selling in markets where economies are growing faster than in the U.S. and where our dollar hasn’t appreciated as much. Other companies are taking more “conventional” steps—including aggressive and innovative pricing structures that allow higher revenues at the cost of lower profit margins.
“A Place Where Every Journey Starts From Kilometer Zero.” The OK is derived from the kilometer zero marking.
I've heard amazing things about this and think it will be wonderful for when she's older. I also am tempted to set it up in our room so we can sleep under the stars and learn constellations. I could be an astronomer! And if I attach vague meanings to what I see, an astrologist as well! Dual bonus!
Deputy Commander in Chief,
What’s that you say…you have a shoe fetish? And you love Kevin McCloud? AND you enjoy strolling around London looking at awesome design whilst wearing a monocle? Well don’t I just have a treat for you…
The Earth Painter
I kept half-expecting the song to drop into a drum & bass breakdown. Thankfully, the Sub Zero remix does just that while maintaining the atmostphere. There are few cases where I prefer a remix over the original but this might be one.
‘Did you win?’ she asked, breathless.
Well, the weekend surely goes too quickly. Its back to the grind. We have had a lot of changes lately, people leaving in high positions, makes one a little nervous. Anyway, it will be a day of moving work around, and reviewing files, etc...
! pound asparagus about 16, halved
(1) Jesus spoke Aramaic, a Semitic tongue allied to Hebrew (Hebrew at this time being a dead language); our Gospels were written in Greek, a language with belongs to quite a different family, the Indo-European. It is obvious that a certain amount of interpretation and paraphrase is to be expected in all the Gospels, as without this no translation would be intelligible.
The survey results do, however, also highlight that there is stark difference in perception between those who already have a business presence in Africa and those who do not.
Woman learns to hate to the extent that she forgets how to enchant.
4 piece
This leap reminded Xu Guan of his first training tower jump. He and his classmates had jumped from a ten meter platform into a sandpit below. They had been drilled over and over again to keep their feet and knees together – to transfer the impact of the jump up the sides of their lower legs and knees and then up through the sides of their torsos.
They are adorable stacked, perfect for an ottoman and the ideal way to affordably add a little oomph to your decor! Think children's playrooms as well! I would love to see these done up in bright colors for a Candyland inspired playroom! Next Wednesday, we'll talk about the Gum Drop Pillow which is so cute inter-mingled with the Honey Bun. It's time to spruce up our homes, Folks! Pillows are the perfect way to do that!
Here is the rest of the press release:
In fact what I once knew as cutting edge will now mostly be obsolete, with the possible exception of human intelligence gathering, informants (and informant protocols). handlers, controllers etc and the models of collecting, collating, verifying and classifying of any intelligence gathered for operational or profiling reasons. All of that experience comes from the UK mainland and only occasionally did it involve other nations (such as Eire for obviously reasons at the time, and Turkey when I stumbled across unexpected PKK involvement in something, leading to months and months of ad hoc liaison with Special Branch, Regional Crime Squads et al).
Here is a guy I was willing to pet. There weren’t many at this park that I would want to extend my hand to touch. We were told that this guy was roughly 300 years old. He was a bit moody but if you were 300 years old I think you’ve earned that right.
Ellen was right about one thing, after high school we all went in different directions. Becky went in the Air Force and Ellen went to culinary school. I went to college. We kept in touch the first year, but then we started to drift apart.
Just a burning desire to make music.
Anyway, to Siobhan and her campaign – recently she received a surprise endorsement by implication from Michael Portillo for her policy on a third runway at Heathrow. However, she generally has a strong manifesto and takes a refreshing approach to the Capital and presents a clear vision for the future of the City. None of the other candidates have a manifesto which demonstrates a clear deliverable vision for the City and a workable plan to deliver it. Her manifesto focuses on several key areas:
Ace is broken, her faith shattered, and the Ancient One is freed to kill Fenric.
There are artistic treasures from stately houses but also thousands of everyday items from modest homes, mills, cottages and workplaces. All the paraphernalia of life – with many quirky, unusual, retro and bizarre objects – come together to form ‘time capsules’ of life across the centuries.
For those of you who love books and are located in Taiwan, there is a Book Festival happening in Taipei this weekend. It is being organised by Mark, of Alleycats Huashan and John, a long term Kiwi expat and author. There will be group discussions on pre-set topics, question and answer sessions, presentations from local authors and, most importantly, the chance to stock up on hard-to-find and second hand titles. It is also going to be the launch of the Taiwan Book Exchange. Can I get a "whoop whoop"?!
Moby
Of streaks of gold,
Later that day, the first televised interview with army Captain Amadou Sanogo, the apparent leader of the junta, was visibly off-the-cuff. When the Africable journalist asked what motivated him to take power, he said:
“And this is a penis.” He said. I started laughing. He broke the nervous tension that I was feeling and I really appreciated it. I knew that this was going to be ok. Peter may have been a younger guy, but he was so easygoing and I knew that sleeping with him might actually be…fun.
#3: I stole a handful of mints from Mellow Mushroom. Who takes just one?
Car with driver – Limousine service Cannes MIPIM 2012
I have a novel idea. Let’s just let the Middle East stew in its own Islamic juices. Along with the Maghreb, the northern tier nations of Africa, down into Nigeria, wherever you find an Islamic regime, you find millions of very unhappy people.
And the last one, I just turned my head every 10 seconds. If you look closely you can see my ear right under my eye.
Mailing Tape
What is a normal “writing” workday like for you?
Another entry into this months Crafters Companion Blog Challenge: Four Legged Friend
The redo was brought about because the couch had seen better days and Bill had FINALLY warmed up to the idea of color on the walls. So the whole family went shopping for a new couch. Imagine trying to make 8 people happy. Well, I got out voted when they all fell in love with this couch. While I liked it, I didn't love it. I didn't really want a sectional again, thought the fabric was a little weird (it's kind of like terry cloth), and really wanted something more tailored. But it had room for all 8 of us, Bill could definitely see himself falling asleep there, and it was a "non-snuggling" couch (Bill's term) - important now that Cheyenne can date.
Wyrobek AJ, Watchmaker G, Gordon L, Wong K, Moore D 2nd, Whorton D. Sperm shape abnormalities in carbaryl-exposed employees. Environ Health Perspect 1981; 40: 255-265.
- the first crown court criminal trial to be held without a jury in England and Wales for more than 350 years. (BBC)
In, Through the Looking Glass, Alice is on a journey to become a queen-an adult. The symbolism that can be interpreted from book is endless.
Soon-to-be-victim: ‘Er – yes, all right.’
More Tulum.
I leave you with Mr B (the other Mr B) doing some dance moves at the Albert Hall concert..he is not afraid to make fun of himself and his boy band days..
The House at Tyneford, by Natasha Solomons – I had very high hopes for this book, and they weren’t disappointed. The House at Tyneford is the story of a young Jewish woman who flees Austria during the years before World War II, heading for the safety of England on a “domestic service visa” in which she will take up a position as housemaid in one of England’s great houses. Elise isn’t an ordinary housemaid – the daughter of an opera singer and a famous novelist, she’s used to parties and champagne and silk dresses and being waited on by her own maid, not to hard work and sacrifice and disrespect. But as Elise grows into her own in England, she befriends the son of the master of the house in which she works, and their friendship will blossom into a romance that will have profound effects on everyone who lives at Tyneford. This was a lovely story – well-written, heart-wrenching and uplifting all at once. I was really afraid it would stink, because it’s exactly the type of book I build up in my head until there’s no way it can meet my expectations. Happily, this one did.
Review-
Although he had escaped the belligerent poverty and social turmoil of life in the 3rd world, he was now residing in Harlem which had its own share of drama. Growing up on the streets of New York, the young man became enamored with Hip Hop culture, writing graffiti and starting to rhyme at an early age.
You can tell it is the first day of the summer holidays for Drama Queen No’s 1 and 2, the sun is out, towels draped on lawn and the bathroom seems to have taken on strange sci-fi like purple glow with magenta touches. This last phenomenon possibly not unrelated to the fact DQ no.2 and a couple of friends seems to have dyed their hair what could only be described as an interesting array of colours. Am now bracing myself for enraged calls form angry mothers. My own particular view is that so long as it is back to its normal blonde for the first day of school in February, a time that seems unbelievably blissfully far away, then that’s fine.
for their illusory protection
1. Chris Malisse (S) 38; 2. Nick Miragalia (S) 39; 3. Christian Cavaliere (S) 40; 4t. Dan Rudolf (S), Ray Grossman (S) 43; 6. Eric Rizzi (Hd) 54; 7. Connor Yankowzich (Hd) 60; 8t. John Hughes (Hd), James Olson (Hd) 62; 10. Noah Campbell (Hd) 65.
But in the meantime, what does a team do when they need to still get in some speedwork?
I was forced to repaint the entire top half because there were some imperfections where the wall met the trim from the first time it was painted, and we ran out of the original paint color. So I picked up a quart of Valspar's Magic Spell (the original paint was color matched to this) and crossed my fingers that the paint would be an exact match...
2 Untitled
So, I got out of bed, downed a cup of hazelnut coffee, made some phone calls and secured a photographer and a couple models for a shoot that's scheduled to take place Thursday afternoon. Expect to see some quirky pictures of some lovely ladies by the coming weekend!
Ok, I’m going to start by admitting that this wasn’t as bad as I thought it would be. With the beauty of hindsight, we can probably blame the trailer for that, which Montoc & I lambasted in The Trailer Trash Two some months. That trailer (in my opinion) set the film up as “Three Men In A Space-Boat”, with the faintest hint of space-alien possession causing one (or two) to kill the other(s). With that thin premise, one wondered how they could string a film out for 90 minutes.
'Actually, I only saw my father three times after I was six.'
■Color theme should be Green and White
Since 9/11 there have been at least 1035587 civilian Iraqi and Afghan lives lost that are not widely commemorated, remembered, revered or documented. These are also lives lost as a result of 9/11, either at the hand of coalition forces, al qaeda, taliban or suicide bombers. Regardless of who is responsible these innocents are still victims that are largely ignored and overlooked when a value is being placed on life.
Alright, nothing really weird was going on, they are just a mixture of urban and scenery shots and model shots, but still, I apologize for spamming each an every one’s mailbox.
This design is named Village Lampwork Necklace, as it took a village of artists to create it. I feel very lucky to be inspired by the artists who created these beads, and reminds me once again, that inspiration makes the world go round. And it often takes a village for things to come together.
Shake and strain into a snifter and float a fresh basil leaf.
“No. Someone’s just honking their dog. Hear it barking?”
"Honestly … I did. Sigh. Is that bad? That I liked it?"
If you are new to Find a Friend Friday (FaFF), you are in for a treat! It's a simple linking party to add a link to your blog so friends, old and new, can stop by and visit.
The highlight of this Safari was the days spent in the Serengeti. The immensity of this dry, arid land is breathtaking. In the evening, resting on a chaise, watching the sunset, the only sounds were the ones of the animals settling in for the night or huntting. An elephant slowly passed right by me, eating his evening meal of tree bark, I could almost touch its trunk. I felt pure joy, absolute peace in this magical, perfect yet brutal land.
baguette
The book will probably be out in paperback within the next month or two. I am currently building an Author's website, and will have a button to send interested bloggers to my Amazon Bookstore page. With that being said; how about I get back to work. Here are a few old posts that I've added to, updated a little bit, added some pictures, and include some things that still bother me.
The Violin Face has a structure that I think lends itself to serialization--the prose equivalent of what theater calls "French scenes." In classical French plays, Character A would be onstage and would be joined by Character B; then Character C would enter and Character A would leave, etc.. It was as if the focus of the play was handed from one character to another. Violin Face does this with a rotating POV, where each chapter is told from a different POV, and that POV belongs to someone who was portrayed in the previous chapter. Only one character has two chapters (the first and last chapters of the book.) This POV discontinuity makes it a natural for publication as a periodical.
Here are a few ideas:
Toilet paper ( 1 roll per package)
So basically, I was doing okay. But for some reason, despite having read The Courage to Start, despite knowing that it's really important not to push yourself, I thought, man, I need to do the 5K outside! Never mind that I was perfectly capable of completing it indoors, I thought, I should do this.
'put her in her crib mom!' ... so poor maggie got sentenced to her crib....and was quiet content for a while. playing with her sesame street legos that her sisters had so sweetly put together for her to just tear apart;) and then rayley beth would add random toys to try and keep maggie entertained...until she gets tired of everything and notices what her sisters are playing with looks way more interesting ;)
that attraction
You can play factions off against each other up to a point but as you get towards the end of the game you’ll need to decide where your loyalties lie. Fortunately for me I had sided with one group throughout and stuck by them all the way.
Analicia Cube, founder of Take Back Santa Cruz, a grassroots public safety advocacy group, said members are planning an awareness event in coming days.
1996: 156 deaths
Victim: Babara Denmark, 69, told her grandson she loved him, moments after he stabbed her 25 times
Perhaps my lifetime’s last melodrama
I remember when my first-born hit this age, and I panicked. What in the world was going on? I had obviously failed in some, or more, parts of my parenting, because this child was absolutely crazy! He didn't know what he wanted, he didn't like what he used to like, he couldn't do very simple tasks he used to excel at. And then he'd turn around and say the sweetest thing. What was going on here? One minute I was hugging him, the next I wanted to lock him up in a sound-proof, padded room. Our relationship was a giant pendulum swinging from beautiful to ugly in the matter of minutes.
The 47 Ronin – 2
Since the entire day yesterday was spent indoors frantically trying to complete a few applications to exciting job postings, I decided I would spend my afternoon wandering around the South Bank into South London today. My day started fairly early (after staying up till 3:30) to finalize an application I wanted to submit to Centrepoint, a charity that engages homeless youth in volunteering opportunities. Once that once complete, I grabbed a quick bite and started walking to my11:00 a.m. interview for a volunteer position with Groundwork London, an exciting opportunity that would have me working with various community groups to develop a support network for skillsharing and funding collaboration for growing hubs. It was a good thing I left at 10:15, because what should have been a 20-25 min walk had me take 40 minutes since I managed to get turned around at least twice. But of course, that is exactly what I want to do anyway…it’s the best way to discover little nooks and crannies. How else would I have found “Surrey Row” – a throwback to where I grew up (yes, I know there is a Surrey here too…and I do plan to visit it!)
I think that a bunch of the rest of this pattern is going to go much faster as the scales are no where near as elaborate as on the green dragon and there is sky over water which is much more solid.
What happens with a change of seasons? There will be erratic weather with unpredictable wind and who could tell from which direction. The spring and autumn seasons often generate cyclones, tornados, hurricanes and the like. So add spiritual insight to the common sense factor and right decisions should result.
When I think about friendships that last, it seems to me that what is common is that there has been room for change. Not necessarily personal change; just change in the amount of time available, life circumstances, or whatever. Some relationships have gone from spending time with each other several times a week to hardly at all. Some, every day to a couple times a year. If both parties can handle it and are willing to let the relationship change and morph, without clinging to what it used to be, then there is space for something new to emerge.
Eleven years later, Josie is divorced and alone. She keeps mostly to herself, save the occasional lunches and dinners with her colleague and friend, Howard. She places her life on hold, impatient for the day Austin turns eighteen and she can try to find him.
@PROTIPZ: Glenn and a band of plucky conservatives fight back a hoard of evil libs preventing the opening of the Hellmouth
This morning one of my facebook friends asked did anyone have a trick for peeling eggs. There were 31 comments: how long to boil it, how old the egg is, cool it in ice water, peel it under running water, roll it around the counter etc. There was only one other one besides me who knew the trick. Her name was Oma which I think means Grandmother.
The author goes some way to providing some background about the Titanic, but the information provided is not exhaustive, and is not intended to be. After all, it would merely replicate information readily available. The GM is given enough to help impart the atmosphere and feel of the ship, and there are plenty of little details included that can help bring to the fore the foibles and idiosyncrasies of the investigators’ fellow passengers. Amongst all of the given information is an amusing nod to both the author’s televisual consumption and Lord Fellowes’ more well-known work. If there is an issue with the given investigators, it is that they feel too isolated from the setting and have little in the way of attachment to it. The dramatic potential of The Millionaire’s Special would be greater if the pre-generated investigators had persons or belongings that were important to them, perhaps even as Pillars of Stability, so that their survival was as important as their own.
The colors are going to range from light pastels to bright and shocking neon colors.
O is for Overnight hospital stays: None for me
Preheat oven to 375-F. Line the bottom of the tart shell with mozzarella. Arrange the tomatoes over the cheese in a ring around the edge of the tart and a second ring in the center. Sprinkle with salt and pepper. Drizzle with olive oil.
“I left the hospital, drove to the restaurant, and waited there for Jake. When he didn’t show up, I came back here. I think you know the rest.” She stated it matter-of-factly and wiped the last of her tears away.
I want to take the time to thank all of you for all the sweet comments, you all are so awesome!! I'd also like to thank those of you who are now following me-you rock! And to my good friend Suzanne-thank you so much for allowing me to share in your special one year anniversary hop!! Love you sweet lady!!!
So this is where I’m at. I’m really enjoying the challenge and the improvements. We’ll see how far it takes me.
Thought Of the day :
Now is anyone asking who Caesar Achellam actually is? Well, we are informed by a Uganda People’s Defence Force (UDPF) spokesman that the capture of this “Major-General in an outfit of about 200 fighters”, which might make us think that the LRA really is all chiefs and no indians, is “big progress because he is a big fish.” Ah, “a big fish” and what we might have is just one more fishy story in the very tall tale of Washington’s humanitarian intervention in Africa.
I like adding beer to things. In small quantities, like in the chili below, it adds a little depth, a touch of sweetness, and a little bite. Too much, and it might dominate in the wrong way, especially true with bitter beers. I've made beer sauces that just turned too bitter (I made one for a leg of wild boar I was roasting using Hövels Original), and Irish stews that were too roasty from too-generous a helping of that cooking stout, Guinness, so the choice of beer can make huge difference. I think a good way of choosing a beer for cooking with, at lease on a first pass, is whether you'd drink that beer with the food anyway. A Weissbier gravy goes really with pork, for example (and some day I'll share my cider/apple juice/cranberry sauce, which I found goes great with roast duck).
been one of the highlights of my life and has brought me so very close to
2. What are you reading right now?
“Praise be to the Lord, to God our Savior, who daily bears our burdens.” – Psalm 68:19
Due to the matte finish these foundations are not so great for dry skins but aimed at a combination/oily skin type.
I can only imagine the BBC have been shamed into making this admission by those who have pointed out how misleading earlier reports about the salute had been.
In the same way, they have hated the irrational, the arbitrary, the accidental (as the causes of immeasurable physical suffering). As a consequence, they negated this element in being-in-itself and conceived it as absolute "rationality" and "purposiveness."
Have you noticed a few changes around here? I'm playing around and remembering things from that one HTML class I took five years ago. Anywho...
i feel wronged.
One plate was affixed to a Harley Davidson V-Rod motorcycle that is registered in the name of the president of the Sopranos Biker Club, Mr Moraka Ephraim Mokoka and the others were fitted to a BMW Z4 coupe which was both unroadworthy and unregistered as of Monday 12 September 2011.
A: Two. One to change it and another to ask the people to embrace ‘change.’
One of the upcoming recordings announced is a Covent Garden of Britten’s Peter Grimes from 1958, with Pears and Sylvia Fisher, who, notably, does NOT appear in the composer’s recording of the opera made a few months later. This endeavor is worthy of support.
After that, I made the rounds and caught up on my reading of those blogs that I follow, oftentimes reading without commenting. Thus it has continued until now, and for that I apologize.
“No, that’s alright. I’m going to work on scraping and sanding. You go ahead and work on that lawnmower carburetor over there.” Bruce shrugged his shoulders and turned to his workbench, picked up the carburetor, his screwdriver, and began working on the hunk of metal in his hand.
The Almond Shower Oil comes in three different sizes. 2.5 fl.oz ($8), 8.4 fl.oz ($24), and 16.9 fl.oz ($48). I have the 2.5 fl.oz which is their travel sized one. If you want to try out this product but you don't want to spend too much money on it before you know if you like it or not, I highly recommend that you pick up the travel size. You get 35ml off product which is quite a lot off product. I have used mine several times and I still have a lot off product left in my bottle. The great thing about this shower oil is that you don't need to use very much as it foams and lathers beautifully. This is a product that is going to last you a long time and its definitely worth the money :)
that is made vulnerable by an obedient shutter,
Pushing the boundaries of what fans have come to expect from the record-setting entertainment franchise, Call of Duty®: Black Ops 2 propels players into a near future, 21st Century…
With all due respect, to the former First Lady Nancy Reagan after this past week I wish the reason my brains felt like eggs frying on a hot skillet were because of drugs. Even now, there is serious debate going on in what few active brain cells I have left about the possibility of sending both my precious children to military boarding school.
There are 5 stages that make up the framework that allows us to live with loss: denial, anger, bargaining, depression and acceptance. They are tools to help us frame and identify what we may be feeling. They can also be applied our grief over the loss of our ‘old’ selves.
...wondering what to do with that boring-ass poached chicken breast? Wonder no more. Dump this sauce over it, run it under the broiler to put a nice brown on there, and once you taste it you will forget all about how you are speeding recklessly toward a quadruple bypass.
Sometimes I wonder if other people have more sophisticated expectations from rock music than I do, because for them, the huge power chords and singalong choruses and propulsive drumming of Foo Fighters songs just isn't enough for them. And granted, Dave Grohl's songwriting is a bit formulaic, and his lyrics can be kind of a mess ("the heart is a clock/ just like a bomb it keeps on ticking away" is the most appalling mixed metaphor of 2011). But when these guys are on, they're pretty fucking good, and they were on for more of Wasting Light than nearly any other album they've ever made.
When my woman heart is in need
The solution I’ve found, where it’s convenient anyway, is to tether the camera to a laptop. Most modern DSLR’s should be capable of being controlled remotely from a laptop and there’s a range of freeware out there to help you along. For this example I’m using Sofortbild on a MacBook Pro tethered to my Nikon D7000.
Leading Sunni Scholar Sheik Yousuf Al-Qaradhawi Supports Suicide Bombings in Palestine and Declares: “I Am Against the Peace Process”
In any event, sometimes I wish I could be a man for just one day to get some sort of sense of the psyche and drive behind them. And I really wish every man could be a woman for just one day to get a sense of how it feels to be vulnerable (it would be excellent if this body/mind swapping could also occur during my PMS days hahaha).
They are the perfect addiction, er ... addition, to this recipe and I already know they'll be tops when I add them to maple syrup to drizzle over my souffle-like pumpkin pancakes. Heaven.
realize how big my girls are getting.
Throroughly rinse the chicken wings in running cold water (this is to ensure a “clear” soup for the final product)
Not to be kind, it is a PR exercise, pure and simple. We will see Rambo grand-standing sometime in January or February showing what a fine fellow he is by catching so many criminals in December.
Here's a video to see what our kids chose. Let me say, the apple didn't fall far from the tree - Bree is as indecisive as her mama!
Appalled, the preacher replied, "I'd rather be tied up and taken advantage of by women of ill-repute than let liquor touch my lips."
10. CBTL offers the ice blended drink! Buy two, get one free. Yey! :)
but they were hers.
Just six hours after it was evacuated by security forces, the West Bank outpost of Maoz Ester was being rebuilt Thursday by dozens of settlers who returned to the site of their deconstructed homes.
*Objective fulfillment
“Why not give each boob its own one?” I suggested.
Given all this, it’s a little hard to figure why the owners of Zuccotti Park permitted their property to be used and abused in the name of an extended anti-Capitalist protest. Turns out … it’s not complicated at all. All you have to do is “Follow the money, honey!”
I enjoyed an exhilarating experience this weekend! After a morning of housework, followed by an afternoon of babysitting our 23-month old, we ran down to the local HEB to pick up a few food items. And then ... wait for it ... we stopped by Goodwill. Yes, we just felt like junkin' for a few minutes.
Pub owners have moan that a ban could put them out of business. Sorry, I don’t buy it. Lose revenue, maybe, but close, no. They’d all be playing by the same rules. The tiny minority of pub customers who won’t go to a bar because they’re not allowed to smoke would be more than made up for by the increase in customers who might return because the environment is now smoke-free. There are many more non-smokers than smokers – and with luck, that ratio will continue to increase.
Only a question less or a question more;
I like to wrap my burgers in collard leaves. This one was dressed up with buffalo wing sauce and fermented nut cheese and served with coleslaw. You can also saute your burgers like veggie crumbles. I utilized cabbage again in this quick saute with caramelized onions.
– Daniel meant “God is my judge;” Belteshazzar meant “Bel protect his life.”
This is a small example of the pitfalls of ESTA. Even when a worker is a threat to one’s safety and livelihood, you cannot get rid of him. Many workers have abused this law. Was this the goal of the legislation, that farmers would be at the mercy of people who are not only of no use to the farm operation but who are a danger to the whole farming venture?
The University of the Philippines Diliman, is ranked 332 by QS, and 753 by webometrics but can’t be found on the list of THE and ARWU.
6. Do you experience/Have you experienced mood-swings? How do you help / how have you helped yourself out of it?
The long awaited fifth coloring book is nearly done! It is a story of Cora’s creation. I have done the illustrations. (She had the story done in one day…it’s taken me months to do the drawings.) You and your kids can do the coloring.
I still have hopes to write more on music, absolutely. There’s a book called Beneath the American Renaissance by David Reynolds. He’s looking at the period of the American renaissance, the age of Whitman, Dickinson, Melville, but culturally he’s widening the lens, he’s consciously suppressing some high/low distinctions we almost instinctively make and was looking at the whole culturescape that was happening in those decades.
I splurged tonight and bought some super nice fabrics from Japan. I cannot wait to have these fabrics in my hand! This purchase inspired me to organize my existing fabrics and look at what I "discovered!"
Give me a call at 772-626-4271
Orbital – Satan Live 3
Additionally, I have asked those who seemed to have contact with organizers to immediately remove my name from posters, flyers, online advertisements and YouTube announcements. As of this writing, my request has not been honored.
“One of the biggest challenges we had was figuring out what the game was going to be about,” writes Dallas. “The idea of painting a white world is pretty abstract. You could make all kinds of different games about that. A lot of people who saw it a few years ago assumed it was going to be a horror game. And it totally could have been. But after splatting stuff for a few months we realized what we liked most about it was the sense of wonder it created. We liked not knowing what was out there.”
Mmm what delicious looking cupcakes!!
Never: 9 (16%)
My son is stealthy little a little ninja. One time I went into the bathroom and closed the door before seeing him flush against the wall. Silently watching me. Sometimes at night I have the horrible feeling like something is watching me. I look up and there he is. Black rimmed eyes like the boy in the grudge staring at me. Waiting to ask me if Michael Jackson had ever gone to the moon to learn to moon walk or why fish never blink when they clearly have water in their eyes. Its eerie and frightening.
Alright- off to work on the spelling stuff! Have a good Thursday!
Paint Brush if using the Copic Opaque
The only true-force behind His veil
If you live near a Rite Aid and you want to try the new Revlon Just Bitten Kissable Balm Stains that I blogged about here, GET THEE TO RITE AID ASAP!
Three of us sleep on mattresses lying on the floor, drift asleep to Mac Davis twanging softly.
Batch sparged at 170F
Gospel of Mark
29th Aug 2010: Andrew Mitchell: Australia’s move to the plain packaging of cigarettes and its WTO compatibility Asian Journal of WTO and International Health Law and Policy 2010;5(2)
grated mature cheddar cheese
A little break from my Scotland posts to post about my normal life here in Cambodia. I realized I don't post that much about our life here at site, even though that's the majority of our time here in Cambodia. Something has come up that I feel so passionate about that I had to post right away.
The BEST GAMES AT PAX in no particular order:
Play the fractured song,
3. Give up on blame. Give up on your need to blame others for what you have or don’t have, for what you feel or don’t feel. Stop giving your powers away and start taking responsibility for your life.
Pepys says in his Diary on June 7, 1665:--
The leaning walls were obvious now, I tilted my head to the right and grazed the room (a little scan is all). The stench was even stronger then before, I hadn’t noticed it coming in, I guess when you clench your fists your nostrils clench right along with them.
We finished the Soul Rush tour and settled into the long, hot summer days in an old hotel somewhere in Houston, and prepared for the big event. I thought at the time that this was it: the end of the world as we knew it. I remember calling my parents and friends and telling them to try to come to Houston. We were all that brainwashed and believed everything we were told.
To create the seemingly impressive graph at the beginning of this post, the ideologues at vaccineinjury simply took their anecdotal feedback from their true believers and stuck that alongside the actual, scientific KiGGS graph. Voila! Pseudoscience at its most heinous.
Since the birth, she has cut deals with media outlets and posed in tabloid photo spreads to get by, touting a book and exercise videos that never materialized.
I'm sidling closer to carry on inhaling.
Abdul Aziz said the EC would take continuous steps to clean up the electoral rolls as required by the PSC.
WIP = Winnowing Innumerable Patterns: Somewhere I've seen the perfect sweater pattern for this yarn. It was in a magazine, or a book, or on the Internet. Oh, no! I'm not falling into that trap. If I turn on the computer I'll start tracking my package again. Better to start with the printed word.
It's a book to make you weep and a towering achievement; I read it at a sitting. My only tiny reservation is about who is going to read it. The adult gatekeepers will - and it does deserve every plaudit and prize it gets. But to which young reader would you give it? A child whose parent is dying? A child whose parent isn't dying? Either way it's terrifying as well as healing.
Everywhere in town
Best Loyalty Credit Card
1 clever
“You are my second son, Thibault, and with the possibility that my heir, the markiisi might one day come to harm, you must marry as if it were you and not your brother who is marked to ascend to the dukedom.”
yathā deve tathā gurau
The Amelanchier (juneberry, serviceberry, shadblow) berries were gathered from the fully loaded mature trees at Brooklyn Bridge Park's Pier One. Rebecca McMackin, the head horticulturist there, is quoted as saying that it suprises her that no one knows about the edible berries: "I guess they're not on the general populace's radar," she said. "I'd be excited to see anyone eating them at this point," she added, popping a berry into her mouth.
It would be too long for me here to stay, to tell you in particular how God did set me down in all the things of Christ, and how He did, that He might do so, lead me into His words; yea, and also how He did open them unto me, make them shine before me, and comfort me over and over, both of His own being, and the being of His Son, and Spirit, and Word, and gospel.
The town traces its origins to the 1860s and the construction of the Transcontinental Railroad. Buford had as many as 2,000 residents before the railroad was rerouted.
Nice reception for both fighters, especially Scott Ettling. This fight was originally scheduled to be a title fight for the 145lb CCCW amateur belt, but Fred Marx did not make weight. So, the title is not on the line tonight. Fred Marx does look like the larger fighter too.
I actually video taped all my stash and will try to get it edited so you can see my space clean and orderly. These pictures are as it looks today... I was down in my space scrounging around and trying to put some order to it all..... =)
This was irritating. To me and to others as well, and for a couple of reasons. One is that the hostess (not one of the women I named above) has cancelled on book group last minutes multiple times, and once before when she was supposed to be hosting. In fact, she had cancelled on the prior two meetings (maybe more?) This is what we call a pattern. It's also irritating because it's just plain inconsiderate of everyone else's time.
We should have gone to church this morning, but we all were just plain beat. This past week the girls and I had dress rehearsals for two dance recitals that had us out until 9PM on Tuesday, Wednesday and until 9:45 on Thursday. Yesterday was the "big day" with two Gala shows. We were at the first show from 10:30-3, had a pizza delivered to the house for a lunch/dinner meal (isn't that called supper?) and were out the door at 5 to go to the second Gala show. It wrapped up a little after 9. We stopped at Sweet Frog to celebrate with some frozen yogurt on the way home and pulled in, exhausted right after 10. It took a full hour to take out the spiral curl wigs from Irish and the heavily sprayed and pinned buns underneath and completely wash out two little heads full of spray and gel. The girls only had three dances this year, but that entailed a total of just about six hours sitting in theaters viewing dance. Paul was a good sport!
The graphics are pretty cute and visually appealing to young children. The puzzles are suitable for young children since there are plenty of hints and free helps to fill in puzzle pieces.
gems from stash
of my fellow officers. The issue remains with out civilian authority.
The Apostle Paul received death threats and had to be sneaked out of a city for his safety, suffered shipwreck while being transported as a prisoner, was snake-bitten, beaten with a whip on several different occasions, went hungry, was imprisoned and finally killed. But in the midst of it all, he gave thanks to God.
A work of explosive culinary art. Don't have to wait a whole year to try this again. (But what will we call the dinner?)
Some other discouraging news throughout the day dampened my mood even more. After work I had Scouts, then at home I worked on stuff until 11:00 pm. I was so tired I went to bed without using the treadmill. The next morning I felt upset at myself for not having exercised, until I got to work and remembered that the day before I had walked to the store on my lunch break. It wasn’t a mile nor as fast paced as usual, but I moved.
*Tuesday*
Really rough weekend. Still in a low. Can't seem to come out of it. Don't have the clarity to share verbally... I found this song today. It speaks to where I am right now.
We have Mosa Feroz who obtain highest marks in international Mathematics Competition.we have ”Inter Wood” company who is currently working with the biggest Furniture company of the World ”IKEA”.We have best Professors,Cook,Doctors, Engineer and Banker,then why people can’t accept us as a Country?Why they didn’t accept Pakistan as a Perfect living place?
Ps: I don't like asking for you to follow me as an entry to win, but if you want to know about future giveaways and be up-to-date with the outfits, remixes, etc.... check out my Facebook, Twitter and Bloglovin.
-SSB Webmaster
It also has an Innovation Lab to foster design thinking skills from a young age and encourages kids to think creatively, develop problem-solving skills, and nurture a prototyping mindset through what is known as a “Mystery Box Challenge”. This is similar to the scene from the Tom Hanks film Apollo 13, where NASA scientists in Houston have to save the astronauts only with what is on board the Apollo capsule stranded in space. In this case, kids are given a box full of different objects and then challenged to create various new ideas which can range from a ladder for a fish to inventing a space suit for a shark!
"With fewer than 4 000 wild tigers left and commercial trade in tiger parts prohibited under international law, traditional Oriental medicine is turning to lion bone wine as a legal substitute for tiger bone wine. Asian consumers may not know this, however, as lion bone wine is frequently sold in tiger-shaped bottles."
Alright, enough whining from me. The bottom line is that, there are adults and children who do not learn well from flash cards.
FRA - Fragrant (Yes or No)
sipping drinks, like an iced tea in the afternoon or a nice scotch in the
And what was I doing while Wednesday partook in all the wild rides?…. Why, lounging in one of the preschooler’s rented strollers, of course!
Tuna steaks, jacket potato & salad
Overall, I am super pleased with his progress given that he can work through his back at the walk and trot, canter calmly around the perimeter of the arena, steers off the leg, and can calmly walk outside the arena and on roads on the buckle. Initial backing and training has been a success!
Anti-natalist policies adopted by governments should not be discriminatory or undermine people’s fundamental rights.
If I cannot start with the novel, I must start with the original movie. I am aware the film varies widely from the novel. The apes have a modern society in the novel. They drive cars, fly planes, etc. the protagonist, Col. George Taylor, is interested in helping his fellow man enslaved by the apes in the novel, but is a cynical, self-absorbed man only interested in saving himself and Nova in the film. As I said above, I cannot comment with any authority which is better. I can only go with what I know.
I bring this up because 2.0 commences tomorrow night. As Dave says "We are going to Party Hardy When We Party!"
there are tablecloths to find and wash to get back to the church.
The Opening:
This was my Saturday Morning...as I tried to catch a snooze on the couch...this little man found a whisk.
And takes revenge by hauling out old errors,
When I was single, I used to eat whatever and whenever I wanted. Since I had no one else to think about, I didn’t worry about meal planning. I rarely cooked; to tell the truth, I really didn’t know how. There were a few recipes that I had picked up from my mother but mostly, I either ate out or had food delivered. In fact, when I would call the local Chinese place and say, “Hi, I’d like an order delivered,” they recognized my voice and knew my address by heart!
Emily and I saw it together, our simultaneous gasp summing up the previous paragraph . . .
I hope you'll give this technique a try. I can't wait to see what you come up with!!!
We are giving away the copy of the audiobook (CD) that we reviewed. Just fill out the form below!
Plaza Senayan Food Court 3rd floor
Include a link to their blog.
While breaking up the already chipped and broken plates I discovered a few things:
Without regulated transparency about who goes to these events and what they pay to be there, we will not, as February puts it, be able to join the dots.
New word.
"That's a good point," she said. "I'm going to ask my manager right now."
Pratyush: – Good morninng.
So here's a quick reminder for the blog candy post, which is HERE, closing the 25th. I keep adding extra goodies, so there's no telling what all will be in there by the time it actually ends!
Two weeks ago, the NA submitted a detailed proposal on operationalising the integration process and the structure of the new directorate. It has been flexible on standard norms of entry (education, age, marital status), and the nature of training courses for those to be integrated. For an institution that was viscerally opposed to integration, the NA leadership’s recent constructive attitude is positive.
Alex and Grig attack the Ko-Dan mother-ship, crippling its communications system; catching the Ko-Dan fighter wings off-guard. The battle reaches a fevered pitch; Alex keeps the upper hand, using the "lone fighter-against-hordes" tactics he mastered by playing the coin-operated video game. Soon, however, his weapons are depleted. Desperately, he activates a secret weapon installed in the Gunstar: "Death Blossom", which destroys all the remaining Ko-Dan fighters. Lord Kril (Dan Mason), captain of the Ko-Dan mothership, blames Xur for this turn of events. After relieving Xur of command, Kril orders him executed. Instead, Xur takes advantage of Alex's attack and kills the sentries escorting him from the bridge. He then flees the mother-ship just before Alex destroys the ship.
I don't always photograph the inside of the cards I make but this is such a sweet message I thought it need an outing! It was cut very simply from spellbinders labels sixteen to match the front and the sentiment is from a Whiff of Joy text set of nine called Magical Wishes. The tiny buterflies are a fikars punch I picked up in a local craft shop sale bin for 50p- bargin!
A wooden letter also from the dollar store $1.
DO NOT LET YOUR BATTERY FULLY DISCHARGE!
It's almost Friday! Whoop! How is your week going so far? Today was busy busy, but so much fun! I worked on a lot of fun new things for the classes we are starting in April. I am loving all of the new stuff we have going on at the club. I look forward to every class I teach and take! :) More information to come on those in the future. Maybe even some fun videos.
The blood and water mix,
Tools = Big Shot, Nestabilities, Shapeabilities, Cottage Floral embossing folder, and Stamp-a-ma-jig
Appreciating the evidence, the Judge added: “The prosecution has been able to prove that accused Dalwinder Kaur Dhesi, Paramjit Singh Raipur and Nishan Singh abducted Harpreet Kaur, who was a major, by deceitful means…. The prosecution has further been able to prove that accused Dalwinder Kaur Dhesi and Paramjit Singh Raipur got Harpreet’s pregnancy terminated without her consent after keeping her under sedation and this was not done in good faith or for saving her life”.
That was a bad night. I so did not know how to be on a date, and every bit of that night goes down in memory as an excruciating reminder of why I did not have many dates in high school. And why the boys I liked always went for my friends instead of tall, gawky Nympho Eyed me....
To save on costs I finished the redo from there. You’d think it would be quick, but nah. You know me. :)
For the first couple feet of its fall, I don’t worry; it will land on the carpet, which is thick enough not to cause concern. But then I notice a vase one shelf below it toppling. It falls immediately behind the leopard, chasing it all the way to the floor. They land at almost the same millisecond with a tiny chink that I know signifies the leopard’s demise.
Grateful for so much.
So anyways, he loved the cinnamon roll to the extent he asked me why I don't make it at home. And so that's what I did, make cinnamon rolls. The first time I didn't take pics nor did I bookmark the recipe and so had to search around a bit this time. No luck still and so I had to make do with a new one. It wasn't as perfect as the first time, but we loved it nonetheless. I have bookmarked another recipe as well, and if it turns out better than this one, it shall be replaced. For now here are the details:
Cardstock: Butter by Creative Memories, Raspberry by Creative Memories
When Tuesday the 1st rolled around, it was more of a disappointment than surprise to find there would be no show that night! Why - an unknown electrical malfunction had taken the station out of action and off-air for the evening. Technical gremlins, pesky gremlins and variations on the gremlin themes were repeat motifs for the rest of the evening spent in the pub.
Skate Boarding.
Originally these Snippet Rolls are supposed to be put onto an old wooden thread spool, however my swap friends and I have all decided that they need to be hung and not rolled, so they can be seen.
cherry blossom, railings, wheely bins outside my house.
More about Joanne:
Then there is my blue 'bits' bin, kindly given to me by a fellow classmate from when I was well enough to go to card class on a Tuesday night. I have missed not being able to go, but I've not been well enough to go for weeks and weeks.
It’s darkly funny, overly gruesome and hard to predict how the Coen Brothers take the story. The charming characters and exciting ransom plot make Fargo a classic and another Coen success. It almost makes me want to go there and take in the bright blue sky over the snowy plains. Might even stumble across all that money hidden away…
Talked to adoption agency and they said I am breaking records on getting all my stuff done. Let's just say I am one determined mama!! They gave me the go-ahead on beginning the dossier process!! I can't help during the holidays to wonder what Christmas will look like. Will we have a picture of our daughter and at least know who she is? Will we maybe even have her home yet? I'm just hoping that we get a referral before next Christmas.
Meehen (Corvallis, OR) is another addition to the defense. He started 17 games for Northwest Nazarene, scoring a goal for NNU.
I encouraged both children to sit down and draw their own transformative pictures. My four year old jumped right in, the older hesitated a little. While they were drawing, I sat and drew some of my own. I found it helped some to have a homemade stencil and attempt to trace it over and over on a page and then slowly focus more on the outline of the negative space between the stenciled image, and slowly set aside the stencil and draw that outline and let it become the focus.
Like all great ideas, it started out as an innocuous little seed. I was reading a book by Wayne Dyer and came across a portion where he said he has run 8 miles each day for decades, never missing a single day. My inner OCD over-goaler was impressed. I imagined the commitment of engaging in that. But make no mistake, I wasn’t considering running myself; I have always loathed and detested running for exercise.
good but has its disadvantages. Preparing for the baby has now become
Threatening
Think about it.
Take your time and pray
So my sister Kelly has bought herself these shoes from ASOS. She's bringing up two teenagers on her own, so you can imagine that she doesn't really spend money on herself but sometimes its nice to have a little treat. It just a pity that my teenage niece is now the same shoe size as her mum, so I think she needs to hide these somewhere safe.
Today it was in the fifties, and after getting an exceptionally late start–entirely my doing, I should include, and to my partner’s chagrin–we made our way to the upper tier of The Bihedral Area. Taking the first lead on a 5.7 climb we’ve both done dozens of laps on, my partner signaled down to me that he was feeling…off. Some kind of inner-ear imbalance was throwing off his equilibrium, and I lowered him to the base of the climb.
When our Lord taught His disciples how to pray, it was thus He said they should begin.
But then just as we returned to our car to head for home, we wandered past another coffee shop right by Oxford Road Station. Too full of caffeine for one day, we’ll have to try Java Espresso Bar another time. Hey, we have time before our book goes to print, so if any locals have views on this venue, do let us know…
Plus you need to include a biography of yourself – maybe half a page.
Is that how it is for you guys? Does your man follow those hand swats through making each one giant or does he pull his hand back making it sting?
At the end of July, early August, right after my grandmother passed away, things were coming to a definite direction with K and the kids. They were days away from moving into their new home. Just about at that time, I lost contact with them. K's second cell phone was broken and supposedly it was getting repaired. I had no more money to give them, but we tried to keep in touch. She gave me an address where they would be moving so I could set up the wishlists for people to send items to. But the address was incomplete, or wrong.
Cassie ran as fast as her long, skinny legs would carry her. The screen door banged shut behind her. A sound guaranteed to piss off her mother but she didn’t care. She had to get away from her. She had to escape the cutting words that sliced into her as sharply as any knife, carving away at her heart until the only way she could stop the bleeding was to run to the big oak tree across the yard and climb high into its enveloping branches. Past the long abandoned robin’s nest. Past the broken limb that snapped off in the thunder storm last year. Higher and higher she went until the branches thinned and she doubted the next one would hold even her slight weight.
I took this picture at Yankee Stadium in 2008
“There have been several attacks on the offices of Equitalia (the agency handling tax collections) in recent weeks. I want to remind people that attacking Equitalia is the equivalent of attacking the State,” she said.
He looked everywhere except her face, and felt relieved that she was driving. He hadn't wanted to tell her in case she thought it was her fault. It wasn't.
5) On 5/31, have two non-time-sensitive blog posts written and ready for future use on a day when I'm not able to post something "new." - Ideally I won't have to use the one I have completed and I can wrap up the second one I have in progress and be all set.
Now I know for some of you, this might sound a little “woo woo”. But the point is that rather than feeling “in lack”, you purposefully count what you have. It’s easy to find gratitude in having food in your stomach, clean sheets on your bed, your children, perhaps some family members and some friends.
04 - Monodic
Yours faithfully,
Dear readers, this has proven to be the start of very eventful year.
Björn: I have a surprise. My parents visited the Northwest in the sixties. Both are huge Betty MacDonald Fans and they went to Vashon of course and they met ........
It didn’t take long for my blood work to come back and show a list of things in my system that didn’t belong there.
* AWESOME SHOW. You, reader who is strangely not Maggie: Go watch it. Now. I will forgive you for not reading the rest of this post. It is on Netflix instant, so no excuses. No Netflix? You can find it by nefarious means out in the wild and wooly Internet. Go. You’ll thank me.
One can argue that suffering is a necessary and unavoidable part of life. Through suffering, we grow, we become stronger, and we get more in touch with our inner being. Such a lovely counter argument, but does it in any way negate the original proposition? If one learns to better control one’s thoughts – which is the cause of suffering, wouldn’t that increase one’s happiness? This is obviously a typical debate in which no one will be right or wrong, but where the one who argues more strongly will triumph.
The old inefficient lighting is not banned but why would you not leverage safer long term measures and be able to save money while reducing the toxic carbon released into our atmosphere?
Thanks to everyone who left comments about our BIG snow! Yes, hubby did get home on Sunday and is now back at work on his normal shift! The sun is out today and it makes the snow even more beautiful! We are now preparing for the next BIG snow - due here on Wednesday - and will be going out today to buy some more munchies and kitty litter (I use that instead of the rock salt). The last time we had this much snow was in 2002-2003 when we had about 30" and I had to go out to make a path for our dear old dog Tequila (the kids named her!) a great Doberman, German Shepherd, Pitbull mix, who was the best dog we ever had. She was old and couldn't jump through the snow drifts and wouldn't even consider using papers inside the house; so there I was, with hubby at work and son in the Air Force, digging her a path so she could go out and 'do her business'! She passed away at the great old age of 15 about 5 years ago and had a wonderful life, so we were sad but also happy that she was with us for so long. The kids are all out of school and I am sure will be heading out to go sledding today. I can see the birds checking out the berries on my winterberry bushes and then taking turns eating their fill. The viburnums have great berries too and they are also covered with hungry birds. Maya is out there now checking out the snow and getting ready to start jumping around! Actually, she is running right now as I type!
7. ‘We wish you’d make the first move sometimes”
for me not to feel like I can suddenly breath deeply and properly again knowing that home is just down the road...
Other things to note: This is a MG book, but I think YA readers should enjoy it, too. It's written on the upper end of MG and while it takes place in middle school, it easily could take place in high school. Fetching is a standalone.
It used to be that Hamilton police Detective Derek Mellor would execute a warrant in a hotel room for a drug dealer and his sole focus was getting the dealer. Police often turn a blind eye to the prostitute in the room.
The grounds for revenge were obvious even to the young minds of Zub and myself, but our dads could not decide the means from within their collective stupor. At that precise moment, a lightbulb went off in my tiny crown, and I began to shout, "Steal his wheel, Daddy! Steal his wheel!"
I turned round and saw the art director’s bulging veins in his neck as he attempted to push the car backwards out of the way. He had broken the car driver’s window and released the hand brake…! That’s when my adrenalin kicked in! Enthusiastically I joined the criminal fraternity and helped push the car out of the way. We had cleared the remaining broken glass off the floor just as the truck arrived.
Round 4: Ch 3. *2 dc in nxt dc, dc in next 2 dc. Repeat from * around. (40 dc) Join to top ch of ch 3.
sad eye puppy dogs
Yngwie Malmsteen - solos
the hundred burning holes within.
EDITOR: Brussels?
AGM followed by a led discussion “Torture for Humanists”.
Anne of Green Gables series by L.M. Montgomery--read 1 out of 6 but want to reread them all (series finished) A precocious girl grows up on Prince Edward Island.
He sought counsel of the Moon above
Attempting to paint the animal rights view as out of touch with commmon-sense environmentalism, Michael Pollan shares the ongoing story of an ecosystem restoration project that requires the killing of feral pigs, formerly domesticated animals that have made themselves at home in the wild.
“Of course,” Creme snidly remarked.
The foreclosure crisis is finally showing signs of subsiding, as the number of households facing foreclosure in April fell 2 percent from a year ago, the first annual decline in five years, according to RealtyTrac Inc.,a foreclosure listing firm in Irvine, CA.
In the past, I’ve been known to blog about manuscripts as I’ve been writing them. If you’re a regular subscriber, you’ll know that I’ve been keeping my current project more or less under wraps.
Working at a high-intensity place where we think and talk all day about “work” means that I hear a lot of people talk about a lack of “work-life balance” in their own lives. I wonder, what is work-life balance and why are we lacking it so much? What can we do about it? Is it enough to just whine–does that make us feel enough better that we can move on and simply not address larger issues?
Jaela - when she lets me do whatever I want to do, like go bowling.
*Riot’s janitor walks by holding a large sack.*
What do you love about writing?
Wrapping Paper
The aggressive part of my passive/aggressive personality is turned loose in the books. I can let myself go through my characters; I can destroy without regret, lie with a straight face and a cold heart, and generally, get away with murder.
Back in 2000, when George W. Bush was jostling with John McCain for the top spot on the Republican ticket, Michigan's non-Republicans did come out in sufficient numbers to play havoc with the results. Our then-Governor, John Engler, was a strong aWol supporter -- he promised Bush he would deliver the state for him. There was a lot of talk of putting Engler on the ticket for V.P. if Bush carried Michigan in the primary. Unfortunately for Engler, he was sufficiently despised by that time that no one wanted to see his party loyalty rewarded: Democrats and independents went to the polls to vote for McCain in that open primary, and McCain won. It no doubt helped that back then, given a choice between McCain and aWol, McCain seemed like a more rational choice. aWol was not happy, and all the chatter about Engler being a rising star evaporated instantly, as did whatever political aspirations he may have still had. The chatter about national office stopped; Engler lost his 2002 bid for another term as governor and vanished into obscurity.
So we get to the concert (late, as usual) and we walk in the back and I can see Harry on the big screen and I can hear him singing and I get all jumpy and clappy and start yelling things like "Harrrrry!" and "Wooooo hoooo!" and "It's okay, I'm here now!!" while Captain Carl drags me to our row.
I'm so freaking excited as we'll be spending the week with my parents, sister, brother-in-law, nephews, and brother.
Who do you think did sparkle best for the New Year?
There was a thick "butter" at the top. Normally, when a beer still has foam at the top, I leave it sitting in the fermenter a bit more. This one threw me off. I am thinking that the stuff at the top was cocoa butter or the fat content of the chocolate bars that I melt into the brew. I spooned that stuff off then racked the beer. The trub at the bottom of the bucket makes me think that the chocolate is all settled out of the beer. I'll have to see how it tastes when I get it on beer gas.
“O God, Thou hast known mine improvidence” (ver. 5). Again out of the mouth of the Body. For what improvidence is there in Christ? Is He not Himself the Virtue of God, and the Wisdom of God? Doth He call this His improvidence, whereof the Apostle speaketh, “the foolishness of God is wiser than men”? Mine improvidence, that very thing which in Me they derided that seem to themselves to be wise, Thou hast known why it was done. For what was so much like improvidence, as, when He had it in His power with one word to lay low the persecutors, to suffer Himself to be held, scourged, spit upon, buffeted, with thorns to be crowned, to the tree to be nailed? It is like improvidence, it seemeth a foolish thing; but this foolish thing excelleth all wise men. Foolish indeed it is: but even when grain falleth into the earth, if no one knoweth the custom of husbandmen, it seemeth foolish… Improvidence it appeareth; but hope maketh it not to be improvidence. He then spared not Himself: because even the Father spared Him not, but delivered Him up for us all. And of the Same, “Who loved me,” saith the Apostle, “and delivered up Himself for me:” for except a grain shall have fallen into the land so that it die, fruit, He saith, it will not yield. This is the improvidence. “And my transgressions from Thee are not concealed.” It is plain, clear, open, that this must be perceived to be out of the mouth of the Body. Transgressions none had Christ: He was the bearer of transgressions, but not the committer. “Are not concealed:” that is, I have confessed to Thee, all my transgressions, and before my mouth Thou hast seen them in my thought, hast seen the wounds which Thou wast to heal. But where? Even in the Body, in the members: in those believers out of whom there was now cleaving to Him that member, who was confessing his sins.
That is a composition I suspect I will revisit. Maybe not in the immediate future but indeed it will happen. I love the composition so much and think it would be a beautiful painting. If I'm really careful, maybe I can improve in the process.
Whenever she exclaimed bravo to her daughter, the girl's eyes lit up. She pleased her mother, and so she felt good about herself. Whenever she said it to my girl, The Wildflower looked at her bemused - she doesn't know that word bravo, nor is she used to such animated responses because she names an animal.
Boy howdy, do I ever wish I had gone to a business printing site and had cards similar (or the same even, these are damn near perfect)made up! I could have used them by the dozens today.
The church we chose had some very positive traits. Some of the important elements we were were looking for in a church were present, and we were hopeful that we might be able to plug into the community and begin to make friends. It wasn’t the best fit, but we hoped it might be good enough at least for this season.
Ralph said to reporters last weekend, “I designed this shirt because no matter how hard I try, I can never be happy. I try and try and try, but these days I can never seem to… It doesn’t matter anymore. It just doesn’t matter. That’s what this shirt is about, I guess. It’s particularly good for walking on the beach alone at 2 a.m. and wondering if you should just let the tide take you away forever. Believe me, it’s perfect for that.”
One of the main things I wanted was a bench type seat with cushions made from my favourite fabric EVER...Cabbages and Roses 'Hatley'. I also had two wicker baskets and two of my DIY locker baskets which fit the cheapy shelving unit cubbies perfectly!! Liners and tags still to be made for the baskets...
Exclusivity to Scrap That!. Product manufacturer sites are fine, but we must be the only online store/kit club that you design for.
Hands tied behind her back
I'm in Vietnam as this post comes onto the blog. Happy Lunar New Year to all those celebrate it!
UPDATE: I guess maybe I should tell you how to submit your entries! You can email them to me at mike(dot)speegle(at)gmail(dot)com, OR post a link to your creation in the comments area.
Single parents become natural survivalist almost doing anything for their child to have everything they need. With so much pressure to keep the outside looking normal that internally we feel ready to give in, but we don’t we carry on and make the most of what we have.
Receiver of the most precious of gifts
How sophisticated does your new laptop need to be?
Everyone knows the story of Facebook, so let’s narrow the focus on a website that was started less than a week ago by a college student at Trinity University.
Nick: “OH MY GOD!!! HE’S RIGHT THERE!!!”
50cm Fishing line
The first house by the water-side,
By watching how the sizes changed,
This time Zlý Časy was a better place to spend some hours. A different waiter was doing a good job by giving nice service and information about beers and breweries. I also met some expats, and I had a great time with them discussing beers, good pubs, Prague and life in general.
So he told her, “If you want to be like them, then you have to work,” and the no-nonsense Silva laid out his long-standing ground rules: train seriously and leave “play time” and the vices of the street at the door … or don’t come back.
1. Higher And Higher/In And Out
What then are the implications for the future of our literature in a culture powered by worship of the Next New Thing?
But millions of people in the world love Marmite. They have it as their favourite thing EVAH. They have it in the morning, the moment they get up. They snack on it during the day and even at night. My gosh, like FIVE times a day, easy. You kind of wonder what else they can be doing with their lives, wasting so much of it on Marmite.
Top five social media networks/tools for marketers 2011:
Because Cranberry Seed Oil penetrates the skin easily, it is highly nourishing and moisturizing choice, leaving a light, non-greasy feeling.
Of the beers made so far, Ale of Leven is a sweetish heavy-type ale while Bonnie ’n’ Bitter is a hoppier beer somewhere between Deuchars and Bitter & Twisted. A darker ale called Kessog was being brewed when I visited.
Some people may consider me strange for choosing to wear Gary’s ring beside my own wedding band, but I think it is a part of my personal healing process. I have found out that grief is a long and lonely journey, and while I don’t contend that my grief is any worse or more special than someone else’s simply because it’s mine, it is mine, and I have to deal with it in my own way, even is that means wearing my husband’s ring on my finger or whispering ‘good night’ every night to his picture that hangs on my bedroom wall.
We are also proud of the fact that all our principle officers are ordinary people, and not members of the corrupt political establishment. Our Chairman, Mr. Peter Mullins is an retired RAF Vulcan aircrew operator, whilst our Executive Council is run by people who have lived and worked in the real world, as opposed to being ‘professional’ politicians who are more interested in making money for themselves than serving the interests of our great nation and people.
Now that our mid-morning wedding rehearsal was complete, we had plenty of time to spare before our rehearsal dinner that evening!
It's no surprise that the pub is such a popular spot with filmmakers seeking to recreate a period feel. The décor doesn’t appear to have changed a bit since 1900....if it wasn't for some hand-written signs advertising modern drinking concoctions such as Jagerbombs and that it has a giant video screen showing the live darts on satellite telly then it was exactly the sort of pub my late grandad would have frequented when he was a young man. And the prices were also of a bygone age - £1.40 a vodka, £2 a double vodka and £1.99 for any pint.
Brookfield to merge hydro power assets into global renewable energy powerhouse @ www.canadianbusiness.com/article/44794–brookfield-to-merge-hydro-power-assets-into-global-renewable-energy-powerhouse–page1
Further Reading:-
Folks, since 2010 Prakash Ramadhar and Vernon de Lima wave Sherrine Hart birth paper and imply that they have real info on Calder Hart….info that would prove he and Manning conspire to abuse and misuse UDECOTT funds…..and I waited patiently and eagerly for the information that would prove to me that Manning’s squandermania (remember that buzz word) would be proven beyond a doubt and I’d be able to wine back on PNM cronies…..to date ah cyah even do like Lyndira Ouditt and Timothy Hamel-Smith and take privileges and wine on Faris Al Rawi (sighhhh)!!! It is now 23 months later and the best this govt can come up with is a weak civil case that their supporters will slaver over in the hopes that the rest of the country will see that they performing! This civil case going to draw out….watch and see…..I giving it 15 years before it get thrown out for lack of evidence. And as for the criminal case the AG says the state is building with Malaysian authorities, keep your eyes and ears out for it….see if you hear anything about it again by the end of the year. If 23 months later they now dealing with it…you don’t think Hart had more than enough time to clean up anything that might be laying around to incriminate him? Study all yuh head good nah?
Then I decided to wait until I hit 100 followers to do this giveaway.
Through the licensing of these technologies and the acquisition of two print facilities, one in Ohio and one in New Jersey, Ingram gains new capabilities to enhance its current proprietary print-on-demand solution. In addition, it will grow the universe of publisher titles and print volume eligible for digital manufacturing.
The movie’s theme song, “Chiku Chiku Mushi“, will be provided by former football player and singer Ishida Mihoko. In July, pictures taken by the cast will be displayed in a photo exhibition.
This is David Cummings alias The English Gaucho hasta la proxima vez
It's just a paperback copy I found at a used book store, but it's a bible for dressage people. I've read it fitfully before, opening it here and there, but now I'm going cover to cover. Joan's teaching aligns very closely (but not completely) with this book. She studies all of the masters and can quote from them at will and tell stories about debates and schools of thought going back hundreds of years.
its too late to weep.
1. Poverty
At least one gift for each letter will be sent. These 7 gifts will be your choices. Choices you will make once you get your partner and and the questionnaire they complete to help you choose what they would like. These gifts can be handmade or brought.
It has been a wonderful five weeks staffing our secondary training school called School of Ministry Development or SOMD. This is the first school I ever staffed, since I have joined staff here in YWAM Louisville back in Jan, 2010. Being put in this close leadership and discipleship position with these ten students has been drawing me closer and closer to Jesus. It has taught me to surrender my time to serve these students in this season, knowing that this is what He has for me. Instead of trying to fix the things which I have no control over, I learned to not worry about those burdens that are weighting down on me as an act of trusting Him, and not to worry that I will be missing out. Seeing our students discovering Jesus fills my heart with joy. Why in the world would I want to do anything else??? Hearts once were cold are now burning for the nations… I wouldn’t trade this season of life for anything, never in my walk with the Lord until this point I have sensed such great hope. We’re one step closer in fulfilling the Great Commission and Jesus’s returning.
The 1967 Broadway revival of The Little Foxes?
I mean, just look at this photo - an everyday scene in Rajasthan, but do you think that if you tried to style something like this, with these amazing colours that you could come even close to pulling it together?
system is slightly different. Instead of writing 750 words, I follow The Rule of 200. It has gotten me through my dissertation and the writing that I have done since. There is no website or digital tool (save for your trusted word-processing program), and rules are pretty straightforward.
Sprinkle evenly over filling. Use your fingers to put nice big crumbly pieces on top.
- Deals by Type – Chart and table depicting information including the number of deals and value reported by the company by type such as Mergers and Acquisitions, Equity/Debt Offering etc.
** Some of the cats have dietary issues such as urinary calculi, diabetes or allergies. They are fed Taste of the Wild cat food as this seems the only brand that causes no problems and which all the cats can eat.
Rated PG. (It's a very long movie --136 minutes-- but it's well worth it. An absolutely beautiful and charming classic romance. Starring Emma Thompson, Kate Winslet, Hugh Grant and Alan Rickman, among others. BTW Harry Potter fans: Cornelius Fudge (Robert Hardy) and dolores Umbridge (Imelda Staunton) are in it too, which is quite amusing. I'd recommend this to anyone who enjoys a good romance as well as period dress-- 1800's.)
K is for Kiss. Remember to kiss your loved ones.
Rebecca Gibney –Consistently solid performer without ever reaching any dizzying heights. Always on screen and thereabouts but you’re likely to reach for something more ... ‘now’. Cooper’s Sparkling Ale.
Should I purchase a URL under '.net or .org' for safe keeping? I am assuming that would require the use of a professional as I would most likely merge all five blogs into one. Something I have been considering for some time.
6. Once you’ve renamed the file to something else, simply close iExplorer, and shut down the app store app on your device if it’s running, and then restart it. The error will be gone and if you open up iExplorer again, you’ll notice the database file has been recreated.
When we are children, maybe that means pretending you're Laura Ingalls Wilder or a mermaid. I don't think people should lose that, personally, because I think that the ideas we have as children are very much who we are inside, regardless of age. But, I also think that reality means it needs to look different than it did when we were little.
At approx 10 cents per kw hour, the mudroom as originally designed costs $36 per year to light.
The next Congress, if power is transferred to the Republican Party, should begin to trim the budget of billions of bogus “climate” and related “environmental” related programs.
2. Longing to Hold You Again
After a few hours of soaking up the sun on the beach, our tummies were grumbling and we drove into town to find something to eat. When at the beach, eat seafood! We settled with Joe's Crab Shack, even though we have one back home, we knew it would be good and we LOVE crab legs.
This is why I am so passionate about Dave Ramsey and Biblical finance. It changed our family tree and I hope and pray you will let it change yours.
Special thanks go to the developers from mingw-w64 this time, because without their work, this release simply wouldn’t contain 64 bit binaries and Patrick von Reth who worked on the 64 bit support on the KDE side, and who just made this release happen.
I am loving the job! But adjusting is taking some time. And it is always hard when you aren’t sleeping in your own bed. My Jackie is staying with Mike while I am out of town and Jen is feeding the Maggie. Impersonal hotel rooms just don’t offer the comfort the my creatures do when they are snuggled up next to me.
This is a verse that has really stood out to me lately. It truly reveals a lot about what we will go through as Christians. When we decide to go all in, and really become “sold out” for Christ, the world is not going to understand it. We are different. God says himself that we are to live “no longer on the world’s terms,” but on HIS terms. This requires us to live a life unlike anything that is sold to us in the world. Even some of the people closest to us will not be able to relate to us anymore. And as we continue to grow in Christ, this sometimes may cause separation between us and people we were once close to. Does this mean we are to cut them out completely? No. We are still to be a light to those people, and show them the love of Christ, but sometimes when people grow, they grow apart.
February 26th, 2012
And I already warned you about that eye rolling thing.
I did this one with my boys when they were young to understand where rain came from and the water cycle. Again an adult needs to be the one doing the experiment with the kids watching. The water cycle is so important to us - it is what allows for life!
So here's Glimmer and Shimmer Bean! I love how bright this turned out. I have to say they were fast to color up and fun too. I didn't want all the extra images that were around each of the beans so I just cut around my image leaving a tiny bit of white border.
A female friend of mine, not close, has been ripped off by one our mutual ‘friends’.
To prevent a long drawn out article with our entire research paper we have split the pilot study into various sections for easy digesting. The full paper can be downloading by following the link below. Alternatively you can click on the Middelburg Pilot study tab above and access each blog post concerning the Pilot study
Here are some dream set loungers and set ups.
For some time I have been missing the horizon, wanting to take the train to the end of the line. I still get lost; it happened twice on Saturday. Angry at myself. I am not used to being careless.
Around the time of the American Civil War, Anthony Trollope writes of the game in his novel Orley Farm:
In the meantime, I ransacked my archives and leafed through the albums. I always take more photos than necessary anyway, and there are shots I've always wanted to share. Like these:
I moved flat back at the end of August. Months down the road, I’m feeling settled in and cosy – really loving the new home and confident I made the right decision. I know where I like to shop … grab a beer … get a cheap lunch. I have a good understanding of the local transport and how to get around my new part of town. With respect to all my day-to-day living, I reckon I’m done or pretty much there.
Covert operations are nothing new in American history, but it could be argued that during the past decade they have moved from being a relatively minor arrow in the national security quiver to being the cutting edge of American power. Drone strikes, electronic surveillance and stealth engagements by military units such as the Joint Special Operations Command (JSOC), as well as dependence on private corporations, mercenary armies and terrorist groups, are now arguably more common as tools of US foreign policy than conventional warfare or diplomacy. But these tools lend themselves to rogue operations that create peril for the United States when they blow back on us. And they often make the United States deeply unpopular.
Isn’t this lack of anonymity a real kick in the head?
He had positioned her sufficiently far enough away, in a quiet area where she wouldn’t be able to see exactly what he was up to. Jorrie stood in plain sight for about 10 minutes, then he bypassed the desks and took his bags to his displaced operative standing at the outside wall.
I went out to dinner with my husband at a charming restaurant straight after work. Work yesterday consisted of ten hours of two kids with head colds and ear infections. I was a walking used tissue.
Perhaps there's nothing he can do -
That I though would last somehow
I rely on a combination of StudyLink, part-time work and parental assistance to make ends meet. Any change in either one of those components represents a noticeable shift in my standard of living. I don’t have a MacBook Pro, I don’t go on volunteering trips to Honduras and my diet doesn’t include any dining out or expensive nights on the booze.
- be exposed as a girlfriend beating nutjob (hello, Scott Cohen)
Last week, I went out to dinner with a group of my favorite ladies! Over the past year I have developed such a great relationship with my bootcamp buddies and we try very hard to get together every so often outside of our sweaty bootcamp sessions! This particular evening we went out to dinner to celebrate our girl Shelly's birthday! After tossing around a few gift ideas, I threw out the idea of a gift basket....and knowing how much my girl Shelly likes mojitos, I had the perfect "theme" for our gift! A "make your own" (MYO) mojito basket!!!
The Pinhead statue goes on a long rant about how Mr. Bar Owner Guy has to help him out because they’re both the same kind of evil. Mr. Bar Owner Guy tries to say he isn’t, but Pinhead says “The evil has been in you since you killed your parents…” Wait, what? He killed his parents? That’s an interesting plot thread…will it be elaborated on or even brought up ever again? Of course not! It’s just one throw-away line shoved into one of the last scenes this guy is in. This is just astronomically stupid! It’s like if I made a movie about a bunch of real estate brokers doing normal things except for one line where one of them says “I remember when I was a space traveler from the seventy-sixth dimension of Zaxar…” and then it’s never brought up again. HOW IS IT THIS HARD TO TELL A COHERENT STORY?!
I was looking for something to eat and my husband said, I thought you were having dinner. I told him, no, we just got our nails done. And I showed him my nails.
CARAMEL APPLE PIE SHOOTER
I sure got my exercise at the Metropolitan Museum of Art when I was back east. It'd be easy to spend months in there in an attempt to see it all. We did not see it all in the many hours we were there. Maybe half of a percent.
Hope everyone had a wonderful weekend! Things have been really busy around here I hope to catch up on reading everyones blogs this week!
Granny and Pa xo
It's worked out pretty well.
Probably one the most boring hangar you ever seen. Not as interesting as Jester’s hangar or as stylist as Rixx’s but hey that’s my hangar like it the way it is. All in all I use most those ships in the hangar at some point or the other, some much more used than others.
The new year is supposed to bring change. I doubt I will be able to fully change and progress unless I move from my current location. I need a breath of fresh air. A change in surrounding. Something to break up the monotony. However, I can’t do that just yet. Not just yet. And it frustrates me. So for now I am drifting. Doing all the right things. Making all the right moves. Taking the right steps. Yet still..
Contestant: Oh, (pause) Doctor.
ing (a strategy for survival
*Committee for Open Debate on the Holocaust
Bombay-born Mujahid Hussein, 41, who found Jesus aboard a cruise ship in the Caribbean 17 years ago, is now known as David Elijah. He was ordained by Kings Revival Church International of Dubai, United Arab Emirates, the largest and fastest growing congregation in the Middle East.
24. Big Weasel (aka Eldest Weasel)
I began by making a batch of strawberry cupcakes. I used a box mix and added a package of vanilla pudding and used 1 cup of milk instead of water to make it a bit tastier. While they cooled I began shaping the ladybugs using gumpaste.
A BAD READ OF THE TEA LEAVES
Still, news of the revised policy raised an outcry.
But mostly, it’s about beer. Good beer, great beer, craft beer, mainstream beer, light alcohol beer, low-carb beer, low cost beer and overpriced swill, tap beer, bottle beer, stubby beer and keg beer. Beers for blokes and beers for shielahs, beer that you import from exotic locations and beer that you brew yourself at home. And any other beer that I may have missed.
“Mr. Diebold: I thought that it would be a fitting sight for all of us to see Professor McLuhan leaving in his own private horse-drawn carriage, so we have one outside.”
Yeah, so this movie starts off…well, about as sprightly as the sixth sequel of any horror franchise could. We get this dorky guy named Trevor and his wife driving in a car. They’re laughing and happy, and then suddenly get serious and say they can work out all their problems. Then they start making out passionately WHILE HE’S STILL DRIVING.
"...Tutors quickly develop dramatic modulations and inflections in their oral read abilities. They also learn to use other vocal qualities to sustain their young readers' interest, such as pronouncing individual words with wide-ranging pitches, using variant paces, and creating distinct voices to depict each character in a story. In addition, by choosing a book to share, tutors gain a sense of accomplishment. They realize that their own reading ability has progressed when they examine the book they chose for their buddy and recognize how much easier it is for them to read it was in their recent past. This value of realizing "how far they have come" as a reader disperses positive affect and leads to growth in other subject areas as has been documented through testimonials of more than 100 book buddies with which we have worked."
Aries all the way...
"I'm the luckiest man in the world."
My card today uses the pretty pre-colored Peony flower digi set from Fred, She Said. This digi set has 10 different color variations! I printed it out, and cut closely around it, then added pop-up dots on the back. My embossing folder is gorgeous! I added a hint of color with Copic Marker V12, then smoothed the edges with 0. I stamped a beautiful "Hello" sentiment from Close to my Heart in the center of the heart. A few pearls, and some flourishes by Marianne Creatables, all adhered to a purple card and I was finished.
Nonetheless, at this point it seems like a desperate act of futility — like re-arranging deck chairs on the Titanic.
This session is entitled Worship Wars, which is really just a play on words, as I’m not here to talk about the superiority of hymns over choruses or organs over guitars, or psalter — a cappella singing only — versus basically everything else. I’m not here to talk about any of that tedium which we normally think of when we hear the words “Worship Wars”. Sorry to disappoint those of you who thought you were in for that.
- I say: I was wondering that as well. – “You’re back from the toilet quick dear” – “Yes, there was a bloke strangling another bloke in there, so I thought I would go later”.
We lived in New England at the time and I made a spur of the moment trip out of Boston intending to make a connection in Chicago to Kansas City. The plane was full, so at the last minute I hopped on one to Dallas, knowing I could connect there as well, but with a very short connection.
And Then Things Fall Apart by Arlaina Tibensky.
Painted on latex is my only form of dress
None of this would matter too much at the moment if it weren't for one very pesky little "Check Engine" light that has come on several times in the last couple of years. When it comes on, I dutifully take the car to the Kia dealer, they run their little scanner to decipher the code, and it turns out to be the same thing. A heat sensor in the transmission is giving off a warning. So the mechanics tear it all apart, check everything out, and can't find anything wrong, so they put it all back together, reset the connection to the "Check Engine" light thingy, wash my car (because they feel bad for wasting my time) and off I go. Nothing wrong, no charge, clean car, see ya!
We're currently under a tornado watch, so I'm a bit creeped out! Time for me to camp out in front of the TV to make sure I can be kept abreast of new and sinister weather... happy Monday!
C: spoon the bread/nut/olive oil mixture over half of each breast
Editors Note: Last week MMWA-SICW open their doors literly to all aspiring wrestlers to have the chance to work with the 2009 MWR Promotion of the Year.
after reading your post on minnesota's official state bird and the like, we did a bit of research. we can't really find that there are so many officially designated things that are danish national symbols, but a couple of things come to mind.
My friend here, (Hmm, I wonder if she’d be mad at me for posting this? Hey, we need some comic relief, right?) was turned around by authorities because they decided that both her sleeves and her shorts were too short. Luckily we had these scarves hanging around, so we were able to tie them around her in order to make her a little more “presentable.” This picture ended up being the joke of the trip, we still even talk about it today, two years later.
Share this post on Facebook, Twitter or your preferred social network.
grace, toppled like the Tower of Babel
That you have been here before
Then I added fine Stampin'Up Dazzling Glitter here and there (with a Quickie Glue pen).
I praise God that I do know Him. I’m not perfect but I’m saved by His grace. I guarantee you that the Real Jesus is so much better than the all the fake gods people have made….so much better than the idols I have worshiped in my own life. I pray that God will help us all to stop trying to put Him in a box and to just get to know the real Jesus.
If you join the progressive challenge last week than you recieved
Today is the first day of spring.
I wanted to ask him if he would help me re-program the front seat on my Silverado, that I couldn’t figure out how to do. “Sure", he said, "lets go look at it”. When I shut it off and remove the key, the seat automatically slides all the way back so you can easily get out, which is fine. However, then when you come back and unlock the doors the seat automatically slides way up forward. So far forward, that I can’t even get in. Then I have to push a button on the dash and to move it back into my previously memorized position. I told Bill I wanted it just to stay all the way back until I get in, then I can push the button and have it slide into my memorized "personal" position. Bill says, “OK, we can do that”. He pushed a few buttons, turned the key switch off and on a couple times and said “There, try that”. Awwww....perfect, that’s the way I want it. Whew, glad to get that done. I must have tried to do that 50 times and couldn’t get it right. I knew Bill could do it. So we were off to see Prescott....you know the usual places, Costco, Sam’s and Wal-Mart. Then, of course, the Gun Shop!!
Do our dreams merely reflect what we hope for?
"I think this part of the song is too dramatic because no one would really play that funky music until they died."
"I see," I managed a trifle weakly. "And where does -- er -- Chief Rain-in-the-Face come in?"
Calvin Coolidge, President from 1923 to 1929, said “Our government rests upon religion. It is from that source that we derive our reverence for truth and justice, for equality and liberality, and for the rights of mankind. Unless the people believe in these principles they cannot believe in our government. There are only two main theories of government in our world. One rests on righteousness and the other on force. One appeals to reason, and the other appeals to the sword. One is exemplified in the republic; the other is represented by despotism.”
Its myriad of axioms and labyrinthine commentaries contain a body of lore transmitted from one generation to another, not just by the written word, but more importantly, by a powerful and mostly secret oral tradition.
Aug 2011 - Back to School
4:45-7 pm, at the front door
Through the brawn and bone I drove the stone
Reading the newspapers never ceases to astonish me nowadays.
“More than the body,” God says, “I heal the heart.”
Less Than Zero
Since my all-time favourite Melbourne-filmed TV show RUSH was sadly AXED last year, I have had to focus my Australian drama sights on another show. Offspring. Which is quite a bit better than Rush, really. Less guns and car chases and loud music, but not enough Sgt Joshua *swoony sadface*… Offspring is filmed in my neck of the woods and I always seem to be stumbling across shoots (I promise not in a stalky way – it’s just that I walk my dog a lot, and your two main shooting locations are across the road from my work – HONEST!!!), so it makes sense that one day I should be asked to ‘sit at the bar with a friend, laughing into your white wine spritzers’ or ‘stroll with conviction down Smith Street, with your eco-friendly shopping bag tucked tightly under your arm’ or ‘cycle gaily down George Street, but MAKE SURE YOU’RE WEARING A HELMET!!!’. But seriously, this is a great show. Well done, writers. Well done, cast and crew.
*Logan and Kalani coming over on Tuesday & Thursday's to help out with my kids while I work and 007 survives
So that high kid from Kerning Square (he gets high on the perfumes, don’t even ask) asks you to get a golden Maple Leaf.
“If the business idea is not sound, the implementation plan will be that of an unsound idea… How sound or sensible is the idea you have? Is it marketable?Who is going to buy it? Can a buyer afford to pay? You need to base your projection on those who are able and willing to pay. Are there enough buyers out there for your ideas. Do you have answers to potential problems. Every idea has problems.”
She has just started pre school.
The reason for this being is that I promised myself earlier this year that I wasn't going to knee-jerk react to products just because they came from camps whose actions I've disapproved of in the past.
Doug Powell: Spin World God
Sea salt and freshly ground black pepper
I’m not going to claim that Highlander is a flawless show, or one without many problems, but it is a really good fantasy show. Based on the fairly awful movies that were not executed well but had a cool premise, Highlander is the tale of Duncan McCloud, an immortal. He’s been around for a long, long time so the shows strengths is combining present day action with flashbacks to time periods in history. I love the flashback stuff, especially when it goes throughout history. The stories that are available are limitless and provide great opportunity to highlight interesting backdrops for a good story. Its the same reason why Dr. Who is ten times more fun when it goes back to historical England versus modern day London. The other component that is awesome about this show is that their can be only one. So that means all alliances are temporary and all immortals are constantly trying to kill each other. How they do this is by chopping off another immortals head and gaining his power through a lightning infused process called the quickening. Whenever a show ends with a beheading you can bet that it is going to be one I’m on board with.
Carter: He was paralyzed by the Iranian Hostage Crisis where 52 Americans were held against their will for 444 days from November 4, 1979 to January 20, 1981, (the day Ronald Reagan was sworn in as president). During his presidency he was consumed by the crisis and in the end was powerless to end it.
‘Rash preaching,’ said Rowland Hill, ‘disgusts; timid preaching leaves poor souls fast asleep; bold preaching is the only preaching that is owned of God.’ ” If Pastor’s preaching can be categorized with any one word, “bold” would be that word.
04. A Dazzling Display
Next Saturday, August 15th, Zona Rosa will be hosting the first ever BrewFest sponsored by Unico Kansas City. Unico is apparently an Italian-American service organization, and I would like to commend them for presenting the event since Italians hardly ever craft a beer worth drinking.
“Show?” I ask.
Through 10 years, 11 albums and a continually fluctuating line-up, the creative core of the Pink Dots has remained Ka-Spel and Phil Knight. The pair found each other in the mid-Seventies, through a shared love of Krautrock groups like Can and Faust. If the Pink Dots are "psychedelia" then it's more in terms of this European tradition of boundary-dissolving expansionism,than the Barrett/Ayers school of Anglo whimsy or American wig-out.
I cannot defend his play in the series, but I can defend Flower: without going into a long statistical breakdown, Flower puts up a Top-10 overal Goaltending perfomance despite seeing Bottom-10 protection. He is in the “Bottom-10″ in Quality Chances Against (odd-man breaks, Breakaways, shots from in the “house”, etc). While the Penguins limit total shots due to puck possession, they do not limit high-percentage chances against; this is a result of skaters being caught up ice while pressing on the forecheck. This stat would likely be even worse if Kris Letang was not available to break up 3-4 odd-man breaks per game (indicated in the team’s below-average record without him in the lineup).
Keepin it Classy in 2010 ;)
If we are products of where we let our mind wander in the quiet and in our down-time, then let’s be challenged by this verse. Of course, lie in, relax, indulge a little, party and holiday. But..make an effort to stay accountable and to keep in touch with your community, keep plugging into God – don’t leave him at uni along with the routines you had built. Here are some tips:
Rows 1 - 6: Knit every row
It was an amusing sight
4x Mulch
He gave me a stuffed giraffe.
I love the snippet I've included above. It is from Pixar's Ratatouille. It reminds me of the power that food has and that with a smell, a taste, and a touch, you can be transported to a time in your childhood when things were far less complicated. Below are thoughts on criticism and how we both give and receive.
153 5. “The Public Interest in Privacy: On Becoming and Being Human.” DePaul Law Review, vol. 26, pp. 767-806 (1977). Many corrections are needed. (Sources: Items D-IV/27/1975, D-X/12/1975, and D-IV/7/1968, below, and Item C-1975(4), above.)
I managed to open the door slightly and tried to manouevre my right leg out through the space, but I've had a knee replacement and my leg only bends to 90 degrees. At this stage, I got cramp in my right thigh. Eventually, after considerable excrutiation, I managed to get that leg back into the car and realized I'd have to manouevre my bum out of the bucket seat and push it way over to the left into the passenger seat so I could get then straighten both legs on the driver's seat, lean backwards and push them both out together through the narrow gap, hoping the body would then follow naturally, limbo-style.
tommy was an entire marching band
The City of New York offered developers a higher Floor Area Ratio (FAR) in exchange for creating public plazas at new developments so, in theory, as the city built a world-class skyline, it would also create world-class public spaces. What followed however was many poorly designed and under-used corporate plazas, often with no public access. The concern was not to increase density but to allow more light and air within the same density or even to ‘thin’ the city out at the height of cold war concerns about vulnerability to nuclear attacks.
The no junk pre-condition makes the lifestyle cyclist, utility and commuter cyclist, more uber efficient in clean, free transportation, fitness and living only with what they need and treasure without the frills. Especially if they are only shopping within a 10 km. radius or less.
Facebook-Really? What the fuck dude? ‘Nuff said
Jemima Khan bravely ventured north, overcoming the M1 turning to cobbles or the train turning to steam at Watford Gap, to meet George Galloway in Bradford. They embarked upon a “wide-ranging interview… [in which] George Galloway talks about his spectacular by-election victory, Ed Miliband’s fortunes, Middle East dictators and mass unemployment.” But the website chose to focus on Khan’s exclusive revealing of “the background to Galloway’s conversion to Islam”. A politician is asked about his “spectacular” political win, former political colleagues, dictators and a huge problem which he, as an MP, is responsible for sorting out… and they chose to highlight his religion. Why?
Abby, whom Caleb called “very artistic, very right-brained … fun and spunky and very cool,” left behind three siblings — 18-year-old, Zachary Giamporcaro; 9-year-old Kimberly Gilbert and 2-year-old Henry Gilbert. They’re left to sift through the pain.
But mostly, what I could see in the written back-and-forth gave me little reason to even reconsider my current view (I was sort of hoping for something more to chew on, you see): Medical marijuana is nowhere near as effective as its proponents claim. Nor is it anywhere near as dangerous as its opponents claim. There are anecdotes of folks who had no relief until they switched to weed, after trying all the approved treatments. But actual benefits that sit still and let themselves be measured by actual trials are harder to come by.
My baby entered this world two days after my full 8 year educational career, and that threw me for a loop. I found myself without the identity that I had worked 12 years to create and was a clueless stay-at-home-mom who was also dealing with postpartum depression! As I searched for ways to connect, I remembered a friend who suggested blogging -- I got to the point where I figured there was no harm in trying, and here we are today! You can read more about my personal blogging story here.
she is handed to me
My fires light up the hearths and hearts of men.
In 1897, Palm announced he was donating the bulk of his library to the University of Texas. This increased the size of UT’s book holdings by anywhere from 50 to 100 percent. Still, I can’t help picturing the librarians muttering through clenched teeth, “What are we gonna do with all those books in Swedish?”
Cassillas saved Kroos’s attempt to give Madrid some hope as Xavi Alonso followed up with a cool conversion. Captain, Phillip Lahm had his penalty saved by Cassillas and Madrid were in it again. It did not last that long as Sergio Ramos took his to the rafters, ballooning it way over the bar.
i'll raise a glass to all of you for your kindness and friendship and hope you'll raise one, as well, to mr. & mrs. moose on august 11th!
Critical Examination: This is one of those rare books that is equal parts entertaining and thought-provoking. Frankie’s exploits are full of humor, suspense, and drama, but she’s not afraid to stop every now and then and consider the consequences of her actions. Her insecurities make her as believable as her smarts and her guts make her admirable. My only complaint was that their was a lot of ‘telling’ without ‘showing’.
Can I afford these products? No. But if have some extra money, you can bet I’m treating myself to some foam.
By this all men will know that you are my disciples, if you love one another." ~ John 13:35, NIV Loving others means that we will be patient, kind, and humble. Whether we are standing in line at the grocery store, stuck in a long line of traffic or doing dishes at the kitchen sink--our attitude is setting the stage for their future. Choose well.
Having a child who hits puberty and suddenly discovers he has an insatiable desire for human blood is an entirely different matter. Just like with sex, your average middle school kid is curious but she won’t act on it. Just like the average vampire middle school like won’t act on the desire to bite his human classmates.
I use a Phillips for this as well, with towel or rag up against the knob. I didn’t want to chance messing up the finish on the knobs.
Paper Secrets celebrated its 3rd birthday over the weekend with a few challenges. I decided to enter a few of them.
'Well, you need three things. A can of red paint, a can of blue paint and a shovel.'
“If only!” she muttered to herself, shaking her little fist in fury at the water. For once her composure threatened to break, and Sharia stamped her foot in anger, splashing water everywhere. It was cool on her hot pink flesh, and she sighed in pleasure in spite of herself with every splashing step.
And it was lovely.
and size 3.5 hook...
2) I searched through my zippers to find one that would do. Zippers don’t have to match perfectly, because if they’re put in properly they won’t show; of course, they should be close to the background color in the fabric or tastefully coordinated. Then I placed the zipper centering it between the two side seams at the bottom seam line.
Tip #1: Give It Five Years
182Love finds an altar for forbidden fires.
Now for years film fans have been using the Scream films as an oppurtunity to prove just how much cooler and well versed they are in horror cinema than the imaginary people who populate the film (Witness the shit fits thrown about The Peeping Tom reference in Scream 4). Yeah! Fuck you fictional characters!!! (This dubious enterprise may have reached its nadir last night in a review that I will not name but to which I must just say, "Wow".) Ignoring the inherent insecurity in such a reaction, let me just take a minute to point out that ninety percent of the audience is likely to have less of a background in horror than you. And aren't you glad about that? I mean if you put all this time an effort into loving horror, aren't you glad that you know a bit more than the average joe? Does that mean the average filmgoer shouldn't get to watch the movie? I mean if they're not well versed enough to get Lamberto Bava or Jacques Tourneur trivia then fuck em right?
I know no one who is entirely happy.
daylight hours. Well, my Benjamin Franklin, inventor of this worthless endeavor, we don’t use candles anymore and quite frankly, I think that you should maybe go stand outside during a lightning storm or something. You may want to take a kite…and a key with you.
Part of my frustration is with psychology studies in particular, which often don’t include a simple cross-tabulation or descriptive table that allows the reader to assess the overall pattern and the strength of the relationship. Any statistical association can be pitched as today’s must-read take-home message. But how big a deal is it in individual real life?
The tweet caused an uproar, with many responding angrily.
I love scrapbooking digitally! Now I always have the right color paper or embellishment and I don't run out of anything!!! I buy a product once and get to use it over and over. I can change the color or adjust the size anyway needed. It's just so much more fun and enjoyable to create layouts this way - at least I thing so.
The most interesting development of the meet, however, was the return to form of Portuguese sprinter Francis Obikwelu. The 32 year old sprinter won the 60 meter title in a PR 5.53. An improvement on his previous 6.54 best set in 2005 and better than the 6.56 he ran in 2004 – the year he set his 100 PR of 9.86 while taking silver at the Athens Olympics. Among the scalps Obikwelu took in Paris were those of Britain's Dwain Chambers and Frances Christophe Lemaitre – last year’s European sprint find.
I married a Gordon, which was unfortunate. Ahem, no, really I was talking about the name, it was a difficult name for him, not only did you have to learn how to do the Gay Gordon dance in school but in 1978 when he was 12, Jilted John was blasting out his one hit wonder "Gordon is a moron" and now the Gordons who spring to mind are Messrs Brown and Ramsey who may or may not set your gusset aflame. Not an easy name to pull off.
"Wall Street capitalism has given us a foul stench in our society," says McCulley.
7 Killarney 1 & 2
Everyone besides me had been girl scouts since they were “daisies” which I think begins sometime between conception and birth. Most of the girls ate, slept, and breathed the girl scout honor. They had so many badges their sashes were full and they had to attach their plethora of badges to a felt shield or their training bras or something. I made it to maybe every other meeting, and had 4 badges. I just wasn’t the gold-award bound scout that the others were.
I will start off saying that i will have to go out and buy some more Halloween candy for the trick-or-treaters because by the time I am done writing this, ours will be all gone :)
Even if I paid $15 a month for The New York Times I’m not sure how many articles I would read above the 10 articles a month they offer now for free. I don’t expect everything to be free on the internet, but sadly, paid content has to compete with free. Zite, which is free, is actually worth $15 a month, because I get access to zillions of magazine articles, newspaper stories, and web blogs.
I am a learner trying to reduce my ignorance.
Unfortunately, that someone forgot to mention to Newt that running for a political office can cause him to lose political weight.
I have no response to claims of ugliness and boneheaded design decisions. They’re in there, for sure. I WILL say that I have already encountered some wonderful and truly creative boss fights I’ve had in quite a while (and I have heard it gets even better by the end of the game) as well as some weird as hell ideas. No, seriously, the game turned into a seriously meta choose-your-own-adventure book for more than an hour there last night, and this isn’t counting the already showcased “Diablo time” and “Twinstick shooter time” going on. These developers have odd brains.
Some people in the class had already covered their cake with buttercream and fondant but I didn't see the point of doing that in advance when I wasn't entirely confident about doing it and would rather Lorna showed me how - I'd only ever done it once before, whereas I got the impression some of the other people had done it countless times.
Targeting bloggers for ‘outreach,’ then, can be just as problematic as yesterday’s broadcast methods, simply because ‘the blogger’ cannot truly speak for, even if they can speak at length about, people like them. A blogger may well be quite different from their readers or ‘followers.’
Female competition sadly often goes back to the patriarchal divide and conquer mentality. If they convince women that their only worth is as objects of beauty, to be consumed by men, and that women have no worth outside of this realm, than arguing who's the fairest of them all is understandable although no less problematic. The struggle should be not to make the beauty ideal different, but to tell the world that we are not obligated to feel or be beautiful. Because when they tell you "every woman deserves to feel beautiful", they mean "You MUST try to be beautiful to prove your worth to us."
My husband is especially excited about her school this year because one of the Dallas Cowboy's player's sons is in her class this year. Let's just say Heath will definitely not be missing any school functions this year, not that he would any way. He's an amazing daddy!
I'm grousing today.
I got a 30-pack The Saem Dessert Jelly Packs as souvenirs mainly because they look really cute! I’ve had to warn my friends not to leave them where other family members can mistake them for jam and try to eat them for breakfast!
Surprisingly, I’m feminine (laughs). My hobbies are cooking and knitting. I also gave mufflers that I knitted to the members and staff.
- Success List: If you’ve read my previous posts you’ll know I believe we should all have a list of our own personal success definitions. Mine are wellbeing, balance, courage, contentment, confidence, peace, love and joy. I started by keeping them in my affirmations book and would read over them every chance I got. Now they are memorised so whenever I have a quiet moment I recite them – its wonderful, no-one else will know, but in that moment you’re manifesting the life you desire!
The BJP, meanwhile, promptly dissociated itself from Mr Laxman’s case, calling it his personal matter. “It was certainly his personal liability, we have always said. We even removed him from the post of party president. He was caught in a sting operation of one lakh rupees. What about Bofors, what about Quattrocchi? Now, at least a fair probe should be announced in those matters,” party spokesperson Ravi Shankar Prasad said.
I think I'm done......I feel like I just threw up. You know how you feel once you do that? Better, yes......but then the next wave of nausea hits. I am so ready to be done feeling this way.
Asked about the probe this week, Radef claimed ignorance.
Christians generally do not want to have anything to do with guns, because a Christian would never take the life of another individual. It is not the USE of the guns that keeps the crime rate low; it is just the fact that the guns are there, and the criminals and would-be dictators know that the guns are there. That knowledge keeps them at bay.
Most important of all: would you like posts like this in the future? Granted, it's not going to be swatches of the newest collections - first of all, I can't compete (nor do I want) with all the amazing lacquerheads out there showing us the newest trends, I don't get my hands on them until they've been out for a while anyway, LOL!, and second of all, I don't buy complete collections unless they all appeal to me (which is rare with collections consisting of 6 or more). It would be random untrieds from my stash instead, some still available, some not. Let me know in the comments! :)
Naturally, members of your local critique group will also do that. The problem may be that they don’t see the whole text and may only be judging at a line-editing level. They may, for instance, say that your characters aren’t clear. Well, probably not if the first time they’ve met them is in Chapter Six and you’ve introduced them effectively in Chapter One. And even if your critique group has seen the whole text, as you’ve altered it as you’ve gone along, they can probably no longer be really objective.
Occasionaly freebies
And when things finally started heating up and sizzling between these two they were ON FIRE! Hope wants to give up control and Matt was more than happy to help her out!
The question then is, what are the model’s predictive, and prescriptive qualities? I suspect if this model is written down properly, it would have multiple equilibria, with advanced capitalist countries being the ‘good equilibrium’ and developing countries being the ‘bad’ one. The question then is, how does a country like Bangladesh transition to good equilibrium?
Teardrop Park is unlike any other public space at Battery Park City. Since Battery Park City has so many public spaces this is an achievement in itself but that Battery Park City has so many different public spaces is also part of the way it succeeds. PPS contrasts with Teardrop Park the significantly different “adjacent Rockefeller Park which is perhaps the best used and best loved section of Battery Park, with the broadest range of users.” But Teardrop Park succeeds partly because, hidden just feet away from Rockefeller Park and other immediately adjacent Battery Park City green space, it offers, on a small scale, the divergent experience from those green space that PPS observes. Battery Park City is remarkably successful in that with all its green spaces there are really no two that are alike. If you sent someone out with a camera they would be hard put to find a location where they could take a picture you could not quickly identify the particular green space where the picture was taken.
Anyways, Ask them a couple simple questions….
The was one of the largest of the American Revolution. Having successfully outrun Cornwallis in the famed "Race to the Dan" across North Carolina in February of 1781, Greene recrossed the Dan River after receiving heavy reinforcements of Virginia militia. The two armies eyed each other for three weeks, but then on May 15th the British learned that Greene had taken position and was inviting attack at a country crossroads called Guilford Courthouse.
In short, The “Obama” Way Of Governing.
McCormack also applies the moniker “realistic” to Barth to point interpreters to Barth’s commitment to the being of God and the Word of God, possessing a reality of its own before any human knowledge of it. This commitment to a form of realism was Barth’s point of resistance to the German idealism that developed around neo-Kantian forms of reasoning in Christian theology. Barth’s commitment to the Subject becoming object, a critical-realist metaphysics and epistemology, and the disclosed hiddenness of God all compel McCormack to preserve this dialectical reading of Barth, and rightly so.
What about you, the guy writing this — who are you?
Once a month you'll see a different kind of post from me.
Every element of Kinfolk – the features, photography, and general aesthetics – are consistent with the way we feel entertaining should be: simple, uncomplicated, and less contrived. Kinfolk is the marriage of our appreciation for art and design and our love for spending time with family and friends.
Don’t worry, there’s relief in the celebratory and drinking songs. My favorite might be “I ain’t here for a long time, I’m here for a good time.” I finally figured out the rhythm to the line “folks are always dreaming bout what they’d like to do but I like to do just what I like.” Who thinks this stuff up?! Maybe my absolute favorite line in all of it (besides “she thinks my tractor’s sexy“) might be “God is great, beer is good, and people are crazy.”
The design is one of Faye Whittaker's "All Our Yesterdays" designs. As soon as I saw it I knew that I had to stitch it. It is such a sweet design. The free kit also came with a card to mount it in. However, I actually have another idea to finish this one off.
Let the oil and the heat do their job getting to know the tofu.
First, the positives of this novel: I found the overall plot intriguing. Ana is thrown into this world, and she doesn’t immediately give into what he wants her to do. She thinks things through and stands up for what she wants. I found her very relatable in certain aspects – although I’m way more submissive than she is, so I couldn’t really understand some of her decisions. The book was easy to read, and I think it did a good job of showing that BDSM isn’t about forcing people to do things; it’s all about consent, which is something that I think most people miss when they see the whips and chains that are often involved. I found myself not wanting to stop reading, and now that I’m done with the first book, I really want to continue the series.
The view from the top of Char Minar was a nice one. You can see the entire old city and the mosque which is besides it. There is a famous bangle shop there. It is in a lane which faces one of the four walls of Char Minar. That same lane would eventually lead you to Nizam’s Palace.
Money comes from customers. Martin Chillcott, formerly a top dog with American Express, M & G, Thomas Cook and others talked about them.
With all the recent wall letters I have done, I was finally given the opportunity put them in a package for a baby shower gift. I purchased a small basket at a local arts and craft store (never leave home without a coupon), and carefully selected a basket that matched the baby's room decor. One of the worst things you could do, is to pick a random basket that doesn't match the room. Picking the right basket is very important. If it won't be used by the recipient, you might as well stick them in a cheap gift bag!
The ending, in which Keaton covertly watches a movie hero to figure out the right gestures to romance his girl, suggests that, though the movies are dreams, they're dreams with tremendous power. Keaton is exploring how we learn to act by watching the movies, how we derive our templates, both romantic and professional, from the things that happen up on the screen. In this way, the movies become, not only dreams, but wellsprings of reality, feeding back into the world models of behavior, the dream influencing and reshaping reality itself.
Kyra turned to Von. Can you do something about that?
One of the common motives for farm murders is robbery, and robbery with violence, or the threat of violence, is all too common. For that purpose, farms are seen as a soft target because of their relative isolation. There is time for the robbers to make a getaway.
On sods; their loose necks pulsed like sails. Some hopped:
Awareness
Despite my anxiety, I'm excited about what I've developed. The key is going to be not revealing too much, and weeding out what isn't necessary.
For dinner, I made chicken piccata served with garlicky angel hair pasta, tossed salad, and garlic rolls. We ate on the porch and then Al watched the horse races at Northfield Park on the internet. I did some posting on this blog.
Lewis Schaffer is Free until Famous: “No End in Sight”
High high high high, Way way up here, Ionosphere
Till I can write madness on my walls
With your head leading, prepare to crawl: take one small step forward on diagonally opposite limbs (for example on your right hand and left knee). At this point your weight should be evenly distributed between all fours.
I don’t know exactly when or why
"You know, I really have enough contemporary art in my collection. I'm looking to acquire a new lover."
“We noticed that people began lining up for dinner as early as 7 a.m.,” said Major Francina Proctor, Central Oklahoma Area Command.
"Ritual" recorded in the early 70s in Belgium its a tasty batch of Latin funk grooves, with a deep Afro-soul sound thrown into the mix, and some slight Chicano rock touches, like fuzzy guitar and heavy organ. It includes fantastic funk versions of two Perez Prado groovers "Caballo Negro" and "Lupita" the latter of which is the monster dance floor mash up but the whole album really rocks.
I really have never seen a man look so permanently surprised.
Sweet Beige is also another lovely pink-beige with visible gold shimmers that's slightly milky. It will look great layered on top of Enviree if you want a glossier, more shimmery punch of color.
Now, for those of you who I didn't have at "zombie."
Beat the butter and sugar until it's fluffy. Beat in the vanilla. Add the flour and mix until the dough just comes together. Press into the bottom of your prepared pan, and make several pricks with a fork. Bake for 20 minutes.
Pasta: 8
First we went to physical therapy-where Shelby taught us many exercises that Marissa will need to perform each day to begin gaining more strength in the right side of her body. She was upbeat and ready to work! With the feeling that has been returning to her side, it will make physical therapy seem more real to her, because she is actually feeling some areas of muscles burn while exercising.
As far as “improving” American security? Americans are pretty much secure from “foreign terrorists”… The idea that there’s a Jihadi hiding behind every rock waiting to murder helpless Americans is retarded. The ONLY threat to American Security is American in origin.
There was a pause, the gardener's question came, as incisive as a scalpel... "Are you happy with the way it is now?"
and Lk11:33.
And put it all together make a beautiful centerpiece for any special occasion. The best part is that after the occasion, the recipient can remove the banner and use it as home decor for Spring and Summer.
Now oddly enough this position may not quite be as ill-thought out as it first appears as it would mean that all of Wales' offshore wind farms, large-scale tidal developments (including any proposed re-badged Severn Barrage) and some of the biomass plant proposals that are floating about would all be excluded. Obviously from a developmental, strategic or practical point of view this is complete nonsense.
Ingredients used were gorjuss girl little red stamp,promarkers,card blank,core card,brads,basic grey green at heart papers and rub on greeting.
I picture two rocking chairs. There is one for each of us, and they are for reading, and laughing, and remembering, together. They are for our golden years, together, for watching the Creator in the mountains, in the trees, in the animals and the birds, in the clouds and the wind and the rain. They are for sharing our happiness, our contentment, and our affection—just the two of us, together, with both of our hearts and our minds finally at peace. After all the turbulence, finally tranquility.
Tomato with premium crackers seemed like an acceptable substitute with some yoghurt, cereal and dried fruit.
To conclude this essay, we will provide our own opinion of Calvin and his teachings. What we think of Calvin before his change to the reformed faith is that he may have seemed to be, or even really been virtuous, but his pride took advantage of him. His friends only made him a much worse person. This corrupted heretic had a demented idea of God’s mercy, his sufficient grace, Jesus’ sacrifice for us, and especially predestination. This essay shows and proves that all TULIP teaches is a falsehood! We actually even learned something from this ignoramus’ mistakes: first, to be cautious of whom we befriend, and second, to avoid proclaiming things of which we have incomplete knowledge. Know therefore, that John Calvin was a fraud, and that the tulip he planted was corrupted with wickedness!
Cane Watch – Eleven (11) men (
Heads.
After a 4 year fight against cancer, the HipHop world mourns the loss of one of the illest MC’s to sprout out of the pivital 80′s, when HipHop was making its presence known and concrete. Mr. Adam “MCA” Yauch, one of the founding members of The Mighty Beastie Boys, has passed today at the age of 47. This really hits home, being that around the time The Beastie Boys stepped on the scene as a HipHop trio, this in fact was the time I discovered and immediately fell in love with HipHop. License to Ill was one of the 1st albums I purchased, on cassette of course and remember listening to it over and over, in its entirely. I loved their fusion of raw hiphop & punk rock and could not get enough of their corkiness and wild-party style.
Suze's heart is won over the Supersized Love and eventually mine is too. It's like a giant Ferrero Rocher, the rich filling of dark chocolate studded generously with whole hazelnuts and sandwiched between two hazelnut macaron shells.
No knowledge of Bill C-279 is required. Actors will be chosen based on their talents.
I mean we had a good laugh.....
I do have one suggestion. I used red cabbage in our soup (pictured at the top) and it turned the broth an unappetizing greyish color. I would highly recommend using green cabbage!
(17) William Quarter, Bishop of Chicago
I started with a base of a circle card and then had fun adding to it. I always start with a semi-vision of what I want in my head...and then usually it just takes a life of its own LOL! This cutie is called "Swimming Tilda" and isn't she fun? (you can find the mini version here too) and they are from the Winner Takes All Collection found here at Magnolia-licious. The papers on this are all from Authentique "Gathering" which used my color theme. I distressed most of the papers with my Zutter Distress machine. I used some tulle that I burned with a match...omgosh I love to do that...I'm like a mini-pyromaniac LOL but I love the curled up texture it gives it. The scrolls are done with a Magnolia Doohickey die then I inked them with some blue ink and added "water bubbles" with my Diamond Glaze. And that fabulous "Under the Sea" was done on YES my new Silhouette Cameo machine...I am so loving that machine and its so easy to use too! I inked it with blue and orange inks and added more water bubbles to it as well.
Ask me a phone’s a phone. No need to go putting things together that don’t fit.
I mean, I don't need 16 cucumber plants, but that's what I sowed.
After months of emails and tweets from M dangling the temptations of LA's famous Sprinkles Cupcakes, she made good on her promise to provide said goodies when Mr. Noodle and I returned to Redondo. True to her word, big sister brought an assorted dozen of the cupcakery's most scrumptious flavors: milk chocolate, strawberry and red velvet. And they certainly lived up to their hyped reputation - the cake was satisfyingly moist and substantial while the thick frosting was sweet without being sugary and so velvety smooth. I could even be persuaded to pry open my purse for more of these treats, if I hadn't found an economic and equally satisfying alternative on hand.
Very little damage done (Someone is looking after me)
So I went and took a look….I was amazed! To buy a set of all of the cartridges I need for my printer at Wal-Mart, which I found to be the cheapest is 65.00! I love to paper craft and tag swaps and such and copying my vintage cards and what not can use a lot of ink.
Here it is with the cover removed:
Soooooooo............. there were 43 wonderful people who followed the rules and announced me their participation, here, on Facebook and directly on my e-mail. I worked on puting their names on little pieces of paper (yellow! :))
This new series has a lot of similarities to its predecessor. The female lead finds herself suddenly thrust into the world of Shadowhunters and the supernatural; one of the male leads is a dark, brooding character with a mysterious past and a sarcastic tongue; there is another male character that has a softer personality than the dark one and begins a friendship with the female; a love triangle develops between the three….there are more, but these are the most glaringly obvious. In spite of the similarities, though, there are enough differences in character and plot that my interest was maintained.
What are her strengths and what are her weaknesses?
I am being a critic here, which takes no skill of my own. Anyone can tear something to pieces. Let me put myself on the line and show you how I would re-write this. Those of you who paid fifty bucks to be here feel free to criticize.
Read the rest of the article – there are some great tips in there, and it’s just great to have some insight into a well-loved author’s writing style and thoughts.
Mein Herr has concocted a plan with some nudging from my side to teach me the importance of maintaining a pet. He has offered me the chance to find a girl suited to the task of being my pet, if I can overcome my feelings of abuse when touched by a stranger. She is my method of coping with the idea and living out a part of the fantasy. Thus I will be updating this piece with at least 1, 000 words every day (excluding Fridays) and will post a new excerpt and a word count on my writer’s blog, Carmen Dominique Taxer.
Tiffany also faced the armhole openings using the same method.
as you know, we started this years ago to give back to you what was freely given to me via punk rock information and turn ons.....a new way of life.
What struck me most about this dream was just how annoying I was. Every time a customer came into the shop I would greet each one with a jaunty “Hello Captain!” As the shop grew busier, the louder my greeting became. I was intensely irritating! I wouldn’t want to go into a Sardine shop while I was behind the counter, and God knows what I was wearing! As Hemingway sauntered through the door, I woke myself up (and The Blonde) by shouting “Hello Captain!” at him in a rather overly camp fashion.
That’s no including my circle structure and frame written out for the book. Which both need to be revisited as their information isn’t compatible with how the story has changed since being written.
Disclosing that four persons died: three men and a woman, while 26 persons sustained various degrees of injuries, the minister said government was taking full responsibility for the treatment of those in the hospital and those that died. “All the dead are civilians”, Adetokunbo added.
just enough very sick and damaged women
I exercise 6 days a week and get at least 7 workouts in a week. I don’t love the workouts, I’ll just be honest, but I do them, I get them in and then they are done for the day. I do like the Zumba workouts though. They are fun! I also run now. I started exercising in May of last year just walking on the treadmill or elliptical every day for 10 or 15 mins. Then worked up from there. In August of 2011 I started the Couch to 5K running program and though I’ve been working this 9 week program for 7 months now, I’m up to a 21 min run. That, my friends, is simply amazing.
I love her Shitake Mushroom chutney. I need to have my brother send me some more. Thank you Ms. Jules for allowing me to sample all your wonderful chutneys, salsa and oils.
The strong office sector recovery last year has significantly widened the gap between office rentals in city areas and business park rentals in suburban areas, which can serve as locations for ancillary offices.
“Considering that the decisions of the Boards of Appeal are not subject to revision … whilst the decisions of the departments of first instance … are open to appeal, it is clear that what constitutes the ‘essentials’ and the ‘relevant statements’ of the oral proceedings before the Board of Appeal needs not be noted down as extensively as the ‘essentials’ and the ‘relevant statements’ of the oral proceedings before the departments of first instance.”
Q: What is Faith?
When the Sun reaches Noon thirty, blazing, I'll bop over the ring of the blow up pool and fall face first into the ocean....A giant salty tidal pool just my size. When I open my eyes underwater, the coquina will be six inches deep, thousands of teeny tiny shells....a treasure chest under the sea. My little pink float will be a peace kayak, and I'll paddle out of my puddle and down to the river where the water runs up, up, up and away....
8. The type is too small. I can’t read the stories.
in the park, a best and fairest. Otherwise live in library books in fantasy lands. What
A couple of companies are making the book and magazine publishing process super easy. And, pretty inexpensive.
Peter Crisp / Ikons & Afterglow / 77
and soft ribbons of the palest pink.
KUALA LUMPUR – Umno Youth deputy chief Razali Ibrahim has questioned the Bar Council’s silence over the “Free Anwar 901″ campaign to defend opposition leader Anwar Ibrahim.
"Can’t stop! Being chased! By things that look a bit like lobsters, only each one’s the size of a house. They’re not really lobsters, they’re Snee. ‘Hello” said to them, all nicely."
understand me
The great news is that on Saturday, I felt a small bit of pain at the bad spot on my leg in the beginning of the race and running up the major hill, but after that I didn't notice it. I kept waiting for it to kill the next day, but it didn't. Then the miracle. I ran 5 miles on Monday, and I felt nothing! No pain, no twinges. Nothing.
So I had practically no clue what day it was. I was taking cough syrup, antibiotics, the occasional Oxycodone, Tylenol, and trying not to go out of my mind. At one point someone saw my jaw do this funny thing that it does, where it kinda opens sideways, like its done my whole life, and they wanted to order an MRI because they thought I had brain damage. Altogether I think I was there 4 days and 3 nights. They let me go with some stronger antibiotics and a schedule for a Chemo and Radiation treatment plan.
Artificial light has some effect but sunlight has much more. Disruption of circadian rhythms affects the sleep-wake cycles of night-shift workers as well as travelers.
Somehow, over the course of my remaining years as a camper, I managed to end up in the same cabin with Terri Jo and with Katherine one more time each (Katherine when we were 13 and Terri Jo when we were 14). My meanness was still there, but not as pronounced and obvious. They were both just left out of everything that the rest of the cabin might have been doing.
S: “I am laughing to myself while Andy tries to fix his watch… “
Before Christ Paul didn’t have spirit, only body and soul. He was zealous for his religious beliefs to the point of killing for them in error against the one true God. But all that was corrected on the road to Damascus one blessed day when he got born again.
Hourglass by Myra McEntire
As you can tell, I'm fighting the temptation to see this as the latest front in "soft jihad", or at any rate as some kind of civilizational metaphor.
Well, I did not get sick. Aside from a very minor headache the first afternoon, I felt great, actually. Maybe it was the fresher air, or the narrow, cobblestone streets lined with cafes and markets. Maybe it was that I felt like I could just reach up and touch the clouds. Maybe it was standing in the plaza on Palm Sunday, watching the processions go by, or attending a Sunday service. Whatever it was, I felt alive in Cusco, like I was really a part of something great. I’m aware of how terribly gauche that sounds, but I can’t even care.
Art is effective when it evokes thought in the eyes of those who see it. The same is true of a good salesman. Since life is sales then we should all desire to develop our verbal art skills to their fullest potential. You should know that in order to effectively communicate your idea to someone you have to make it easy to understand yet impactful so that thought is stimulated in the buyers head about what you are saying. By developing the verbal artist inside you will become more adept at making the sales you want when you need it most.
In the poem entitled "Waste Management," a rather haughty-looking vulture pulls at a strand of the innards of a carcass while standing on the exposed ribs. Here is the poem that accompanies it.
A belated report of singer-cum-actor Park Yoochun’s recent car accident is leaving his fans in a state of worry and concern.
in a small bowl mix the sugar and water. sprinkle the yeast over the top and set aside for 10 mins.
Of the four reasons I list, this one is the most separate. Largely, WoW is a move away from modernity and towards the old, if not ancient, past. Besides the Dwarf and Gnome engineering projects, which are more funny than representative of technology, the game is almost completely at peace with nature. The Night Elves especially represent a love towards nature, and they guard it with utmost respect.
Then: If at First You Don’t Succeed
October 12 - Patricia Breslin Modell, actress (Meg Baldwin on "General Hospital"), 80
The Skin Association funded research into welt reducing techniques. The Stomach Association can up with ways to help with stomach cramps. Pharmaceutical companies pushed a wide range of drugs to combat headaches, sour stomachs, dizziness along with welt-reducing creams and potions. While some of these products did what they claimed they would do, most had side-effects that were as bad as the symptoms that they were designed to cure. If you took one drug to combat a symptom related to cyanide, new symptoms emerged from taking the drugs – everything from diarrhea to impotence and even death.
site almost done.
It’s a beautiful day outside. A gentle breeze and sunny sky. A perfect day in Umhlanga. Yet here I sit in my bedroom afraid to go out into the world. Part of me wants to be on the beach, another part of me argues that there will be crowds, too hot, blue bottles and that the swimming will be horrible because the sea will be too rough. Since I haven’t been how could I know?
In the final chapter Eagleman allows himself space to ponder: What is the soul? Is there a connection between quantum mechanics and consciousness? Do human minds interact with the stuff of the universe? These are questions perhaps more suited to philosophers than scientists but who says you can only be one or the other?
Then they are disappointed and ‘loose their faith’.
a horde of crows,
hand. If being a teenager is about disobedience, the notion of
hubs grills the main entree.
Anyway, as promised, my contract trip wrap up.
I think a more effective approach would be to focus on one company at a time, and have everyone purchase as many shares as possible - then go VOTE at the shareholders meetings. Vote for ethical behavior, reasonable salaries, Elect a board of directors with a conscience - then move on to the next company - sooner or later they'd get the idea. (Yeah I know, takes too long, too much dedication to principle, a clear goal.....)
A line of light runs from me to my two most recent Ancestors, and that forms the image into two halves, at first. Mother side and Father side.
I was drunker than a skunk!
Well, my guest post goes into some of this. I wrote this story by “prairie-dogging.” That means that I had a bunch of fun, unrelated ideas that I thought would be good in a story. My job was to “dig the tunnel” that connected all the ideas into one coherent story, just like a prairie dog tunnel connects its holes.
Dr. Moshe Alamaro (worked with Dr. Eastlund in weather modification / engineering) As a graduate student and later as a Research Scientist at the MIT Department of Earth, Atmospheric, and Planetary Sciences (EAPS) Moshe Alamaro helped to design, build and manage the MIT Air-Sea Interaction Lab where he supervised six students.
designs and other fine scrapbooking products. Want2Scrap brings ease of use
Her haunting eyes implore the camera to, “Come. Capture my reality so that the world can see.” And, at the same time, “Stop! Don’t record my shame!”
Recept: No, not his name. Watson's name.
Broken down, dilapidated, forgotten, these buildings scream at anyone who sees them. When boarded up and lacking light they become something more sinister. Nik's writing effectively captures all of this.
Financial analysts claim you will save money if you keep a budget so that you are conscious of all your purchases. I can attest that it is easy to spend all of my money if I don’t keep track of what I have spent.
and yet, I know that I am lucky beyond belief...
Delayed Combustion Device
Open 5.00pm to 12.30am. Closed Sunday.
For instance, I had a dream that someone I know (a male) was mad at me and punched the hood of my car! I woke up scared and through research, I found out it was about a frustration I was having with a specific task at work. There were a few specific items in the dream that were significant. The car was red (passion), the car was on my right side (present day vs the past), the car was parked (stuck feeling), denting the car (my frustration at feeling stuck).
Probably Angelina's. I like how she pulls of vintage styles with ease and wears them with such confidence. Remember that emerald green gown with the shoulder pads? Love!
Camped out at Laduree on the Rue Royal, Paris. I don't actually like macarons and would take Pierre Herme ones over Laduree's any day (Americano Pamplemousse! Be mine!). But you can't beat Laduree if you want to revel in that "I am in Paris" glow. And need a snack.
Though there are problems with his script, writer and director Marcos Efron manages some beautiful shots, filming on location in Argentina. The stark contrast between a barren, burnt out wooded area, and the beautiful actress Amber Heard is startling, and, if nothing deeper, makes for a beautiful picture. The choice not to use subtitles for the Spanish speaking characters is a strong one, too, and one that brings the audience (the non-Spanish speakers in the crowd) closer to the two lead characters; just as the two girls do not know what is going on around them in this foreign country, neither do we, the audience, and that shared experience helps the audience connect with the main characters, if only a little. Efron’s previous works were all in short films, and his first feature length effort shows promise, but ultimately falls short of memorable.
Meditate and try to connect with your feelings about the present and future. What energy are you feeling in regards to your work life, or your job search? Are you loving life or hating it? Do you smile at work each day or barely make it through? Do you shake your head in disgust every time you email another resume or relish the chance for another interview? Who do you see in the mirror, and what does that person truly want, deep down inside?
Charles couldn’t believe he was having a conversation with a white rabbit in a tux jacket. "What do you mean come with you?"
Since the property that started this whole buying a house/moving thing isn't available, we decided to keep looking. Seeing as how we had already given our landlord our 30 day notice, and started hauling our stuff over to Michael's mom's house, we didn't have much choice but to continue in the plan to move. We knew it might fall through, but we didn't know what an epic failure it would be.
I hope people will support this restaurant and the kind idea behind that. Naich seems to be the ancient name of Nay (Ney) – the Persian flute.
International Customers are welcome and PayPal is your Only payment option. All downloads are instant when paying via PayPal.. These can then be accessed in your account..
Ziggy flicked his head back and gave Moon a warm stare. Moon noticed that one of Ziggy's eyes was a different colour to the other one. He was a different kind of dog alright but Moon kind of liked that.
It occurred at Oracle and Ina, less than a mile from where we lived just a year ago. The thing is if we still lived in that area, I might have been there to meet Gabrielle Giffords and do some shopping.
7. Being addressed as “exquisite honorable passengers”over the PA system on a regional plane.
The greater the weight and the height he is, the harder it will go
"I want to bring you somewhere first though, it's not to far, just a couple of minutes away?"
Summertime
5 If you could have your own tv channel, what would it be about? It would be about living and working abroad, which I find endlessly fascinating!!
For poise,
At least this mad woman is not as feeble minded as those around her suspect and I sussed it out, called the recorded lady on the other end of the phone, pressed all the right buttons and can now continue to spend money that I don’t have until Friday.
One of his visitors during this time said the President received him in the nude, with a buffalo rug wrapped around him like a toga. He frequently interrupted the conversation to stride up and down the room, declaiming famous speeches in Greek and Latin. (This is not all that much different from my typical meetings with my editor.)
